Lafayette Ronald Hubbard (March 13, 1911 &lt;U+2013&gt; January 24, 1986), better known as L. Ron Hubbard (and often referred to by his initials, LRH), was an American pulp fiction author turned religious leader who founded the Church of Scientology. After establishing a career as a writer of pulp fiction, becoming best known for his science fiction and fantasy stories, he developed a self-help system called Dianetics which was first published in 1950. He subsequently developed his ideas into a wide-ranging set of doctrines and rituals as part of a new religious movement that he called Scientology. His writings became the guiding texts for the Church of Scientology and a number of affiliated organizations that address such diverse topics as business administration, literacy and drug rehabilitation.
Although many aspects of Hubbard's life are disputed, there is general agreement about its basic outline.1 Born in Tilden, Nebraska, he spent much of his childhood in Helena, Montana. He traveled in Asia and the South Pacific in the late 1920s after his father, an officer in the United States Navy, was posted to a U.S. naval base on Guam. He attended George Washington University in Washington, D.C. at the start of the 1930s before beginning a career as a prolific writer of pulp fiction stories. He served in the U.S. Navy during World War II, commanding vessels in the Atlantic and Pacific Oceans. He ended the war in hospital and a few years later developed Dianetics, &quot;the modern science of mental health&quot;. He founded Scientology in 1952 and oversaw the growth of the Church of Scientology into a worldwide organization. During the late 1960s and early 1970s he spent much of his time at sea aboard his personal fleet of ships as Commodore of the Sea Organization, an elite inner group of Scientologists. He returned to the United States in the mid-1970s but went into seclusion at the end of the decade, dying on a ranch near Creston, California in January 1986.
Hubbard was and remains an extremely controversial figure and many details of his life are still disputed. The Church of Scientology depicts Hubbard in hagiographic terms, drawing on his legacy as its ultimate source of doctrine and legitimacy.2 He portrayed himself as a pioneering explorer, world traveler and nuclear physicist with expertise in a wide range of disciplines including photography, art, poetry and philosophy. His critics have characterized him as a liar, a charlatan and a madman, and many of his autobiographical statements have been proven to be fictitious.3 The Danish historian of religions Dorthe Refslund Christensen concludes that the Church of Scientology's narrative &quot;becomes meaningful only if it is perceived as a legend or a myth,&quot;4 though the Church itself rejects any suggestion that its account of Hubbard's life is anything other than plain historical fact.5
Early life
Lafayette Ronald Hubbard was born on March 13, 1911, in Tilden, Nebraska.6 He was the only child of Harry Ross Hubbard, a former United States Navy sailor, and Ledora May Waterbury, who had originally trained as a teacher.78 After moving to Kalispell, Montana, the family settled in 1913 in the city of Helena.9 Hubbard's father re-enlisted in the Navy in April 1917, while his mother Ledora May worked as a clerk for the state government.10
Biographical accounts published by the Church of Scientology describe Hubbard as &quot;a child prodigy of sorts&quot; who rode a horse before he could walk and was able to read and write by the age of four.11 A Scientology profile says that he was brought up on his grandfather's &quot;large cattle ranch in Montana&quot;12 where he spent his days &quot;riding, breaking broncos, hunting coyote and taking his first steps as an explorer&quot;.13 His grandfather is described as a &quot;wealthy Western cattleman&quot; from whom Hubbard &quot;inherited his fortune and family interests in America, Southern Africa, etc.&quot;14 Hubbard was said to have become a &quot;blood brother&quot; of the Native American Blackfeet tribe at the age of six through his friendship with a Blackfoot medicine man.1516
 Contemporary records state that his grandfather, Lafe Waterbury, was a veterinarian, not a rancher, and was not wealthy. Hubbard was raised in a townhouse in the center of Helena.17 According to his aunt, his family did not own a ranch but had one cow and four or five horses on a few acres of land outside Helena.18 Hubbard lived over a hundred miles from the Blackfoot reservation. The tribe did not practice blood brotherhood and no evidence has been found that he had ever been a Blackfoot blood brother.19
During the 1920s the Hubbards repeatedly relocated around the United States and overseas. After Hubbard's father Harry rejoined the Navy, his posting aboard the USS Oklahoma in 1921 required the family to relocate to the ship's home ports, first San Diego, then Seattle.20 During a journey to Washington, D.C. in in 1923 Hubbard is said to have received an education in Freudian psychology from Commander Joseph &quot;Snake&quot; Thompson, a U.S. Navy psychoanalyst and medic.2122 Scientology biographies describe this encounter as giving Hubbard training in a scientific approach to the mind, which he found unsatisfying.23
The following year, Harry Ross Hubbard was posted to Puget Sound Naval Shipyard at Bremerton, Washington.24 His son was enrolled at Union High School, Bremerton25 and later studied at Queen Anne High School in Seattle.26 In 1927 Hubbard's father was sent to the U.S. Naval Station on Guam in the Mariana Islands of the South Pacific. Although Hubbard's mother also went to Guam, Hubbard himself did not accompany them but was placed in his grandparents' care in Helena, Montana to complete his schooling.27
Between 1927 and 1929 Hubbard traveled to Japan, China, the Philippines and Guam. Scientology texts present this period in his life as a time when he was intensely curious for answers to human suffering and explored ancient Eastern philosophies for answers, but found them lacking.28 He is described as traveling to China &quot;at a time when few Westerners could enter&quot;29 and is said to have spent his time questioning Buddhist lamas and meeting old Chinese magicians.30 His travels were said to have been funded by his &quot;wealthy grandfather&quot;.31
Hubbard's unofficial biographers present a very different account of his travels in Asia. Hubbard's diaries recorded two trips to the east coast of China. The first was made in the company of his mother while traveling from the United States to Guam in 1927. It consisted of a brief stop-over in a couple of Chinese ports before traveling on to Guam, where he stayed for six weeks before returning home. He recorded his impressions of the places he visited and disdained the poverty of the inhabitants of Japan and China, whom he described as &quot;gooks&quot; and &quot;lazy [and] ignorant&quot;. His second visit was a family holiday which took Hubbard and his parents to China via the Philippines in 1928.3233
 After his return to the United States in September 1927, Hubbard enrolled at Helena High School but earned only poor grades.34 He abandoned school the following May and went back west to stay with his aunt and uncle in Seattle. He joined his parents in Guam in June 1928. His mother took over his education in the hope of putting him forward for the entrance examination to the United States Naval Academy at Annapolis, Maryland.
Between October and December 1928 a number of naval families, including Hubbard's, traveled from Guam to China aboard the USS Gold Star. The ship stopped at Manila in the Philippines before traveling on to Qingdao (Tsingtao) in China. Hubbard and his parents made a side trip to Beijing before sailing on to Shanghai and Hong Kong, from where they returned to Guam.35 Scientology accounts present a different version of events, saying that Hubbard &quot;made his way deep into Manchuria&lt;U+2019&gt;s Western Hills and beyond &lt;U+2013&gt; to break bread with Mongolian bandits, share campfires with Siberian shamans and befriend the last in the line of magicians from the court of Kublai Khan.&quot;36
However, Hubbard did not record these events in his diary.37 He remained unimpressed with China and the Chinese, writing: &quot;A Chinaman can not live up to a thing, he always drags it down.&quot; He characterized the sights of Beijing as &quot;rubberneck stations&quot; for tourists and described the palaces of the Forbidden City as &quot;very trashy-looking&quot; and &quot;not worth mentioning&quot;. He was impressed by the Great Wall of China near Beijing38 but concluded of the Chinese: &quot;They smell of all the baths they didn't take. The trouble with China is, there are too many chinks here.&quot;39
Back on Guam, Hubbard spent much of his time writing dozens of short stories and essays40 and failed the Naval Academy entrance examination. In September 1929 Hubbard was enrolled at the Swavely Preparatory School in Manassas, Virginia to prepare him for a second attempt at the examination.41 However, he was ruled out of consideration due to his near-sightedness.42 He was instead sent to Woodward School for Boys in Washington, D.C. to qualify for admission to George Washington University. He successfully graduated from the school in June 1930 and entered the university the following September.43
University and explorations
 Hubbard studied civil engineering during his two years at George Washington University at the behest of his father, who &quot;decreed that I should study engineering and mathematics.&quot;44 His career at George Washington University subsequently became important, as George Malko puts it, because &quot;many of his researches and published conclusions have been supported by his claims to be not only a graduate engineer, but 'a member of the first United States course in formal education in what is called today nuclear physics.'&quot;45 However, a Church of Scientology biography describes him as &quot;never noted for being in class&quot; and says that he &quot;thoroughly detest[ed] his subjects.&quot;46 He earned only poor grades, was placed on probation in September 1931 and dropped out altogether in the fall of 1932.4748
Scientology accounts say that he &quot;studied nuclear physics at George Washington University in Washington, D.C., before he started his studies about the mind, spirit and life&quot;49 and Hubbard himself stated that he &quot;set out to find out from nuclear physics a knowledge of the physical universe, something entirely lacking in Asian philosophy.&quot;50 His university records indicate that his exposure to &quot;nuclear physics&quot; consisted of one class in &quot;atomic and molecular phenomena&quot; for which he earned an &quot;F&quot; grade.51
He was far more interested in extracurricular activities, particularly writing and flying. According to Scientology biographies, &quot;he earned his wings as a pioneering barnstormer at the dawn of American aviation&quot;.52 One account states that he was &quot;recognized as one of the country&lt;U+2019&gt;s most outstanding pilots. With virtually no training time, he takes up powered flight and barnstorms throughout the Midwest.&quot;53 His pilot's license, however, records that he only qualified to fly gliders rather than powered aircraft and gave up his license when he could not afford the renewal fee.54
During Hubbard's final semester he organized an expedition to the Caribbean for &quot;fifty young gentleman rovers&quot; aboard the schooner Doris Hamlin commencing in June 1932. The aims of the &quot;Caribbean Motion Picture Expedition&quot; were stated as being to explore and film the pirate &quot;strongholds and bivouacs of the Spanish Main&quot; and to &quot;collect whatever one collects for exhibits in museums&quot;.55 It ran into trouble even before it had left the port of Baltimore: ten participants quit and storms blew the ship far off course to Bermuda. Eleven more members of the expedition quit there and more left when the ship arrived at Martinique.56 With the expedition running critically short of money, the ship's owners ordered it to return to Baltimore.57
Hubbard blamed the expedition's problems on the captain: &quot;the ship&lt;U+2019&gt;s dour Captain Garfield proved himself far less than a Captain Courageous, requiring Ron Hubbard&lt;U+2019&gt;s hand at both the helm and the charts.&quot;58 Specimens and photographs collected by the expedition are said by Scientology accounts to have been acquired by the University of Michigan, the U.S. Hydrographic Office, an unspecified national museum and the New York Times,5960 though none of those institutions have any record of this.61 Hubbard would later write that the expedition &quot;was a crazy idea at best, and I knew it, but I went ahead anyway, chartered a four-masted schooner and embarked with some fifty luckless souls who haven't stopped their cursings yet.&quot;62 He called it &quot;a two-bit expedition and financial bust,&quot;63 which resulted in some of its participants making legal claims against him for refunds.64
 After leaving university Hubbard traveled to Puerto Rico on what the Church of Scientology calls the &quot;Puerto Rican Mineralogical Expedition&quot;.65 He is said to have &quot;made the first complete mineralogical survey of Puerto Rico&quot;66 as a means of &quot;augmenting his [father's] pay with a mining venture&quot;, during which he &quot;sluiced inland rivers and crisscrossed the island in search of elusive gold&quot; as well as carrying out &quot;much ethnological work amongst the interior villages and native hillsmen&quot;.67 Hubbard's unofficial biographer Russell Miller writes that neither the United States Geological Survey nor the Puerto Rican Department of Natural Resources have any record of any such expedition.68 Hubbard only stayed on Puerto Rico from November 1932 to mid-February 1933; carrying out a complete survey of the island in that time would have required him to cover some 3,420 square miles69 in only three and a half months, equivalent to nearly 250 sq mi a week.
According to Miller, Hubbard traveled to Puerto Rico in November 1932 after his father volunteered him for the Red Cross relief effort following the devastating 1932 San Ciprian hurricane.70 In a 1957 lecture Hubbard said that he had been &quot;a field executive with the American Red Cross in the Puerto Rico hurricane disaster.&quot;71 According to his own account, Hubbard spent much of his time prospecting unsuccessfully for gold. Towards the end of his stay on Puerto Rico he appears to have done some work for a Washington D.C. firm called West Indies Minerals Incorporated, accompanying a surveyor in an investigation of a small property near the town of Luquillo, Puerto Rico.72 The survey was unsuccessful. A few years later, Hubbard wrote:
Early literary career and Alaskan expedition
 Hubbard became a well-known and prolific writer for pulp fiction magazines during the 1930s. Scientology texts describe him as becoming &quot;well established as an essayist&quot; even before he had concluded college. He is said to have &quot;solved his finances, and his desire to travel by writing anything that came to hand&quot;73 and to have earned an &quot;astronomical&quot; rate of pay for the times.74
His literary career began with contributions to the George Washington University student newspaper, The University Hatchet, as a reporter for a few months in 1931.75 Six of his pieces were published commercially during 1932 to 1933.76 The going rate for freelance writers at the time was only a cent a word, so Hubbard's total earnings from these articles would have been less than $100.77 The pulp magazine Thrilling Adventure became the first to publish one of his short stories, in February 1934.78 Over the next six years, pulp magazines published around of his 140 short stories79 under a variety of pen names, including Winchester Remington Colt, Kurt von Rachen, Ren&lt;U+00E9&gt; Lafayette, Joe Blitz and Legionnaire 148.80
Although he was best known for his fantasy and science fiction stories, Hubbard wrote in a wide variety of genres, including adventure fiction, aviation, travel, mysteries, westerns and even romance.81 Hubbard knew and associated with writers such as Isaac Asimov, Robert A. Heinlein, L. Sprague de Camp and A. E. van Vogt.82 His first full-length novel, Buckskin Brigades, was published in 1937.83 He became a &quot;highly idiosyncratic&quot; writer of science fiction after being taken under the wing of editor John W. Campbell,84 who published many of Hubbard's short stories and also serialized a number of well-received novelettes that Hubbard wrote for Campbell's magazines Unknown and Astounding. These included Fear, Final Blackout and Typewriter in the Sky.85
According to the Church of Scientology, Hubbard was &quot;called to Hollywood&quot; to work on film scripts in the mid-1930s, although Scientology accounts differ as to exactly when this was (whether 1935,86 193687 or 193788). He wrote the script for The Secret of Treasure Island, a 1938 Columbia Pictures movie serial.89 The Church of Scientology claims he also worked on the Columbia serials The Mysterious Pilot (1937), The Great Adventures of Wild Bill Hickok (1938) and The Spider Returns (1941),90 though his name does not appear on the credits. Hubbard also claimed to have written Dive Bomber (1941),9192 Cecil B. DeMille's The Plainsman (1936) and John Ford's Stagecoach (1939).93
Hubbard's literary earnings helped him to support his new wife, Margaret &quot;Polly&quot; Grubb. She was already pregnant when they married on April 13, 1933 but she had a spontaneous abortion shortly afterwards; a few months later, she became pregnant again.94 On May 7, 1934 she gave birth prematurely to a son who was named Lafayette Ronald Hubbard, Jr. and the nickname &quot;His Nibs&quot;, invariably shortened to &quot;Nibs&quot;.95 Their second child, a daughter named Katherine May, on January 15, 1936.96 The Hubbards lived for a while in Laytonsville, Maryland but were chronically short of money.97
In the spring of 1936 they moved to Bremerton, Washington. They lived there for a time with Hubbard's aunts and grandmother before finding a place of their own at nearby South Colby. According to one of his friends at the time, Robert MacDonald Ford, the Hubbards were &quot;in fairly dire straits for money&quot; but sustained themselves on the income from Hubbard's writing.98 Hubbard spent an increasing amount of time in New York City,99 working out of a hotel room where his wife suspected him of carrying on affairs with other women.100101
Hubbard's authorship in mid-1938 of a still-unpublished manuscript called Excalibur is highlighted by the Church of Scientology as a key step in developing the principles of Scientology and Dianetics. The manuscript is said to have outlined &quot;the basic principles of human existence&quot;102 and to have been the culmination of twenty years of research into &quot;twenty-one races and cultures including Pacific Northwest Indian tribes, Philippine Tagalogs and, as he was wont to joke, the people of the Bronx.&quot;103
According to Arthur J. Cox, a contributor to John W. Campbell's Astounding magazine, Hubbard told a 1948 conference of science fiction fans that Excalibur's inspiration came during an operation in which he &quot;died&quot; for eight minutes.104 (Gerry Armstrong, Hubbard's archivist, explains this as a dental extraction performed under nitrous oxide, a chemical known for its hallucinogenic effects105):
Arthur J. Burks, the President of the American Fiction Guild, wrote that an excited Hubbard called him and said: &quot;I want to see you right away. I have written THE book.&quot; Hubbard believed that Excalibur would &quot;revolutionize everything&quot; and that &quot;it was somewhat more important, and would have a greater impact upon people, than the Bible.&quot;106 It proposed that all human behavior could be explained in terms of survival and that to understand survival was to understand life.107 As Hubbard biographer Jon Atack notes, &quot;the notion that everything that exists is trying to survive became the basis of Dianetics and Scientology.&quot;108
According to Burks, Hubbard &quot;was so sure he had something 'away out and beyond' anything else that he had sent telegrams to several book publishers, telling them that he had written &quot;THE book&quot; and that they were to meet him at Penn Station, and he would discuss it with them and go with whomever gave him the best offer.&quot; However, nobody bought the manuscript.109 Forrest J Ackerman , later Hubbard's literary agent, recalled that Hubbard told him &quot;whoever read it either went insane or committed suicide. And he said that the last time he had shown it to a publisher in New York, he walked into the office to find out what the reaction was, the publisher called for the reader, the reader came in with the manuscript, threw it on the table and threw himself out of the skyscraper window.&quot;110 Hubbard's failure to sell Excalibur depressed him; he told his wife in an October 1938 letter: &quot;Writing action pulp doesn't have much agreement with what I want to do because it retards my progress by demanding incessant attention and, further, actually weakens my name. So you see I've got to do something about it and at the same time strengthen the old financial position.&quot;111 He went on:
The manuscript later became part of Scientology mythology.112 An early 1950s Scientology publication offered signed &quot;gold-bound and locked&quot; copies for the sum of $1,500 apiece (equivalent to about $29,000 now). It warned that &quot;four of the first fifteen people who read it went insane&quot; and that it would be &quot;[r]eleased only on sworn statement not to permit other readers to read it. Contains data not to be released during Mr. Hubbard's stay on earth.&quot;113
 Hubbard joined The Explorers Club in February 1940 on the strength of his claimed explorations in the Caribbean and survey flights in the United States.114 He persuaded the club to let him carry its flag on an &quot;Alaskan Radio-Experimental Expedition&quot; to update the U.S. Coast Pilot guide to the coastlines of Alaska and British Columbia and investigate new methods of radio position-finding.115 The expedition consisted of Hubbard and his wife &lt;U+2013&gt; the children were left at South Colby &lt;U+2013&gt; aboard his ketch Magician.116
Scientology accounts of the expedition describe &quot;Hubbard&lt;U+2019&gt;s recharting of an especially treacherous Inside Passage, and his ethnological study of indigenous Aleuts and Haidas&quot; and tell of how &quot;along the way, he not only roped a Kodiak bear, but braved seventy-mile-an-hour winds and commensurate seas off the Aleutian Islands.&quot;117 They are divided about how far Hubbard's expedition actually traveled, whether 700 miles118 or 2,000.119
Hubbard told the Seattle Star in a November 1940 letter that the expedition was plagued by problems and did not get any further than Ketchikan near the southern end of the Alaska Panhandle, far from the Aleutian Islands.120 Magician's engine broke down only two days after setting off in July 1940. The Hubbards reached Ketchikan on August 30, 1940 after many delays following repeated engine breakdowns. The Ketchikan Chronicle reported &lt;U+2013&gt; making no mention of the expedition &lt;U+2013&gt; that Hubbard's purpose in coming to Alaska &quot;was two-fold, one to win a bet and another to gather material for a novel of Alaskan salmon fishing.&quot;121 Having underestimated the cost of the trip, he did not have enough money to repair the broken engine. He raised money by writing stories and contributing to the local radio station122 and eventually earned enough to fix the engine,123 making it back to Puget Sound on December 27, 1940.124
Military career
 After returning from Alaska, Hubbard applied to join the United States Navy. His Congressman Warren G. Magnuson wrote to President Roosevelt to recommend Hubbard as &quot;a gentleman of reputation&quot; who was &quot;a respected explorer&quot; and had &quot;marine masters papers for more types of vessels than any other man in the United States&quot;. Hubbard was described as &quot;a key figure&quot; in writing organizations, &quot;making him politically potent nationally&quot;. The Congressman concluded: &quot;Anything you can do for Mr Hubbard will be appreciated.&quot; His friend Robert MacDonald Ford, by now a State Representative for Washington, sent a letter of recommendation describing Hubbard as &quot;one of the most brilliant men I have ever known&quot;. Hubbard was said to be &quot;a powerful influence&quot; in the Northwest and to be &quot;well known in many parts of the world and has considerable influence in the Caribbean and Alaska.&quot; The letter declared that &quot;for courage and ability I cannot too strongly recommend him.&quot; Ford later said that Hubbard had written the letter himself: &quot;I don't know why Ron wanted a letter. I just gave him a letter-head and said, 'Hell, you're the writer, you write it!'&quot;125
Hubbard was commissioned as a Lieutenant (junior grade) in the U.S. Naval Reserve on July 19, 1941. His military service forms a major element of his public persona as portrayed by Scientologists.126 The Church of Scientology presents him as a &quot;much-decorated war hero who commanded a corvette and during hostilities was crippled and wounded.&quot;127 Scientology publications say he served as a &quot;Commodore of Corvette squadrons&quot; in &quot;all five theaters of World War II&quot; and was awarded &quot;twenty-one medals and palms&quot; for his service.128 He was &quot;severely wounded and was taken crippled and blinded&quot; to a military hospital, where he &quot;worked his way back to fitness, strength and full perception in less than two years, using only what he knew and could determine about Man and his relationship to the universe.&quot;129 He claimed to have seen combat repeatedly, telling A. E. van Vogt that he had once sailed his ship &quot;right into the harbor of a Japanese occupied island in the Dutch East Indies. His attitude was that if you took your flag down the Japanese would not know one boat from another, so he tied up at the dock, went ashore and wandered around by himself for three days.&quot;130
However, his official Navy service records indicate that &quot;his military performance was, at times, substandard&quot; and he received only four campaign medals rather than twenty-one. He was never recorded as being injured or wounded in combat and so never received a Purple Heart.131 Most of his military service was spent ashore in the continental United States on administrative or training duties. He served for a short time in Australia but was sent home after quarreling with his superiors. He briefly commanded two anti-submarine vessels, the USS YP-422 and USS PC-815, in coastal waters off Massachusetts, Oregon and California in 1942 and 1943 respectively.132
After Hubbard reported that the PC-815 had attacked and crippled or sunk two Japanese submarines off Oregon in May 1943, his claim was rejected by the commander of the Northwest Sea Frontier.133 Hubbard and Thomas Moulton, his second in command on the PC-815, later said the Navy wanted to avoid panic on the mainland.134 A month later Hubbard unwittingly sailed the PC-815 into Mexican territorial waters and conducted gunnery practice off the Coronado Islands, in the belief that they were uninhabited and belonged to the United States. The Mexican government complained and Hubbard was relieved of command. A fitness report written after the incident rated Hubbard as unsuitable for independent duties and &quot;lacking in the essential qualities of judgment, leadership and cooperation.&quot;135 He served for a while as the Navigation and Training Officer for the USS Algol while it was based at Portland. A fitness report from this period recommended promotion, describing him as &quot;a capable and energetic officer, [but] very temperamental&quot;, and an &quot;above average navigator&quot;.136 However, he never held another command and did not serve aboard another ship after the Algol.
 Hubbard's war service has great significance in the history and mythology of the Church of Scientology, as he is said to have cured himself through techniques that would later underpin Scientology and Dianetics. According to Moulton, Hubbard told him that he had been machine-gunned in the back near the Dutch East Indies. Hubbard asserted that his eyes had been damaged as well, either &quot;by the flash of a large-caliber gun&quot; or when he had &quot;a bomb go off in my face&quot;.137 Scientology texts say that he returned from the war &quot;[b]linded with injured optic nerves, and lame with physical injuries to hip and back&quot; and was twice pronounced dead.138
His medical records state that he was hospitalized with an acute duodenal ulcer rather than a war injury. He told his doctors that he was suffering from lameness caused by a hip infection139 and he told Look magazine in December 1950 that he had suffered from &quot;ulcers, conjunctivitis, deteriorating eyesight, bursitis and something wrong with my feet.&quot;140 He was still complaining in 1951 of eye problems and stomach pains, which had given him &quot;continuous trouble&quot; for eight years, especially when &quot;under nervous stress.&quot; This came well after Hubbard had promised that Dianetics would provide &quot;a cure for the very ailments that plagued the author himself then and throughout his life, including allergies, arthritis, ulcers and heart problems.&quot;141
The Church of Scientology says that Hubbard's key breakthrough in the development of Dianetics was made at Oak Knoll Naval Hospital in San Francisco. According to the Church,
An October 1945 Naval Board found that Hubbard was &quot;considered physically qualified to perform duty ashore, preferably within the continental United States&quot;.142 He was discharged from hospital on December 4, 1945 and transferred to inactive duty on February 17, 1946. He resigned his commission with effect from October 30, 1950.143 The Church of Scientology says he quit because the U.S. Navy &quot;attempted to monopolize all his researches and force him to work on a project &quot;to make man more suggestible&quot; and when he was unwilling, tried to blackmail him by ordering him back to active duty to perform this function. Having many friends he was able to instantly resign from the Navy and escape this trap.&quot;144 The Navy said in a statement in 1980: &quot;There is no evidence on record of an attempt to recall him to active duty.&quot;145
The Church disputes the official record of Hubbard's naval career. It asserts that the records are incomplete and perhaps falsified &quot;to conceal Hubbard's secret activities as an intelligence officer.&quot;146 In 1990 the Church provided the Los Angeles Times with a document that was said to be a copy of Hubbard's official record of service. The U.S. Navy told the Times that &quot;its contents are not supported by Hubbard's personnel record.&quot;147 The New Yorker reported in February 2011 that the Scientology document was considered to be a forgery.148
Occult involvement in Pasadena
Hubbard's life underwent a turbulent period immediately after the war. According to his own account, he &quot;was abandoned by family and friends as a supposedly hopeless cripple and a probable burden upon them for the rest of my days.149 His daughter Katherine presented a rather different version: his wife had refused to uproot their children from their home in Bremerton, Washington to join him in California. Their marriage was by now in terminal difficulties and he chose to stay in California.150
In August 1945 Hubbard moved into the Pasadena mansion of John &quot;Jack&quot; Whiteside Parsons. A leading rocket propulsion researcher at the California Institute of Technology and a founder of the Jet Propulsion Laboratory, Parsons led a double life as an avid occultist, follower of the English magician Aleister Crowley and leader of a lodge of Crowley's magical order, Ordo Templi Orientis (OTO).151152 He let rooms in the house only to tenants who he specified should be &quot;atheists and those of a Bohemian disposition&quot;.153
Hubbard befriended Parsons and soon became sexually involved with Parsons's 21-year-old girlfriend, Sara &quot;Betty&quot; Northrup.154 Despite this Parsons was very impressed with Hubbard and reported to Crowley:
Parsons and Hubbard collaborated on the &quot;Babalon Working&quot;, a sex magic ritual intended to summon an incarnation of Babalon, the Mother of Abominations. It was undertaken over several nights in February and March 1946 in order to summon an &quot;elemental&quot; who would participate in further sex magic.155 As Richard Metzger describes it,
The &quot;elemental&quot; arrived a few days later in the form of Marjorie Cameron, who agreed to participate in Parsons' rites.156 Soon afterwards, Parsons, Hubbard and Sara agreed to set up a business partnership, &quot;Allied Enterprises&quot;, in which they invested nearly their entire savings &lt;U+2013&gt; the vast majority contributed by Parsons. The plan was for Hubbard and Sara to buy yachts in Miami and sail them to the West Coast to sell for a profit. Hubbard had a different idea; he wrote to the U.S. Navy requesting permission to leave the country &quot;to visit Central &amp; South America &amp; China&quot; for the purposes of &quot;collecting writing material&quot; &lt;U+2013&gt; in other words, undertaking a world cruise.157 Aleister Crowley strongly criticized Parsons's actions: &quot;Suspect Ron playing confidence trick &lt;U+2013&gt; Jack Parsons weak fool &lt;U+2013&gt; obvious victim prowling swindlers.&quot; Parsons attempted to recover his money by obtaining an injunction to prevent Hubbard and Sara leaving the country or disposing of the remnants of his assets.158 They attempted to sail anyway but were forced back to port by a storm. A week later, Allied Enterprises was dissolved. Parsons received only a $2,900 promissory note from Hubbard and returned home &quot;shattered&quot;. He had to sell his mansion to developers soon afterwards to recoup his losses.159
Hubbard's fellow writers were well aware of what had happened between him and Parsons. L. Sprague de Camp wrote to Isaac Asimov on August 27, 1946 to tell him:
Scientology accounts do not mention Hubbard's involvement in occultism. He is instead described as &quot;continu[ing] to write to help support his research&quot; during this period into &quot;the development of a means to better the condition of man.&quot;160 The Church of Scientology has nonetheless acknowledged Hubbard's involvement with the OTO; a 1969 statement, written by Hubbard himself,161 said:
The Church of Scientology says Hubbard was &quot;sent in&quot; by his fellow science fiction author Robert Heinlein, &quot;who was running off-book intelligence operations for naval intelligence at the time.&quot; However, Heinlein's authorized biographer has said that he looked into the matter at the suggestion of Scientologists but found nothing to corroborate claims that Heinlein had been involved, and his biography of Heinlein makes no mention of the matter.162
On August 10, 1946, Hubbard bigamously married Sara, even though he was still married to Polly. It was not until 1947 that his first wife learned that he had remarried. Hubbard agreed to divorce Polly in June that year and the marriage was dissolved shortly afterwards, with Polly given custody of the children.163
Origins of Dianetics
 After resolving the situation with Parsons, Hubbard settled with Sara at Laguna Beach, California. He supported himself for a while with short-term odd jobs,164 before traveling to New York City to resume his fiction writing to supplement the small disability allowance that he was receiving as a war veteran.165
Working from a trailer in a run-down area of North Hollywood,166 Hubbard sold a number of science fiction stories that included his Ole Doc Methuselah series and the serialized novels The End Is Not Yet and To the Stars.167 However, he remained short of money and repeatedly wrote to the Veterans Administration (VA) asking for an increase in his war pension. In October 1947 he wrote:
The VA eventually did increase his pension,168 but his money problems continued. On August 31, 1948, he was arrested in San Luis Obispo, California and subsequently pleaded guilty to a charge of petty theft, for which he was ordered to pay a $25 fine.169 According to the Church of Scientology, around this time he &quot;accept[ed] an appointment as a Special Police Officer with the Los Angeles Police Department and uses the position to study society&lt;U+2019&gt;s criminal elements&quot;170 and also &quot;worked with neurotics from the Hollywood film community&quot;.171
In late 1948 Hubbard and Sara moved to Savannah, Georgia.172 Here, Scientology sources say, he &quot;volunteer[ed] his time in hospitals and mental wards, saving the lives of patients with his counseling techniques.&quot;173 Hubbard began to make the first public mentions of what was to become Dianetics. He wrote in January 1949 that he was working on a &quot;book of psychology&quot; about &quot;the cause and cure of nervous tension&quot;, which he was going to call The Dark Sword, Excalibur or Science of the Mind.174 In April 1949, Hubbard wrote to several professional organizations to offer his research.175 None was interested, so he turned to his editor John W. Campbell, who was more receptive due to a long-standing fascination with fringe psychologies and psychic powers (&quot;psionics&quot;) that &quot;permeated both his fiction and non-fiction.&quot;176
Campbell invited Hubbard and Sara to move into a cottage at Bay Head, New Jersey, not far from his own home at Plainfield. In July 1949 Campbell recruited an acquaintance, Dr. Joseph Winter, to help to develop Hubbard's new therapy of &quot;Dianetics&quot;. Campbell told Winter:
Hubbard collaborated with Campbell and Winter collaborated to refine his techniques,177 testing them on science fiction fans recruited by Campbell.178 The basic principle of Dianetics was that the brain recorded every experience and event in a person's life, even when unconscious. Bad or painful experiences were stored as &quot;engrams&quot; in a &quot;reactive mind&quot;. These could be triggered later in life, causing emotional and physical problems. By carrying out a process called &quot;auditing&quot;, a person could be regressed through his engrams to re-experiencing past experiences. This enabled engrams to be &quot;cleared&quot;. The subject, who would now be in a state of &quot;Clear&quot;, would have a perfectly functioning mind with an improved IQ and photographic memory.179 The &quot;Clear&quot; would be cured of physical ailments ranging from poor eyesight to the common cold,180 which Hubbard asserted were purely psychosomatic.181
Winter submitted a paper on Dianetics to the Journal of the American Medical Association and the American Journal of Psychiatry but both journals rejected it.182 Hubbard and his collaborators decided to announce Dianetics in Campbell's Astounding Science Fiction instead. In an editorial, Campbell said: &quot;Its power is almost unbelievable; it proves the mind not only can but does rule the body completely; following the sharply defined basic laws set forth, physical ills such as ulcers, asthma and arthritis can be cured, as can all other psychosomatic ills.&quot;183 The birth of Hubbard's second daughter Alexis Valerie, delivered by Winter on March 8, 1950, came in the middle of the preparations to launch Dianetics.184 A &quot;Hubbard Dianetic Research Foundation&quot; was established in April 1950 in Elizabeth, New Jersey, with Hubbard, Sara, Winter and Campbell on the board of directors. Dianetics was duly launched in Astounding's May 1950 issue and on May 9, Hubbard's companion book Dianetics: The Modern Science of Mental Health was published.185
From Dianetics to Scientology
 Hubbard called Dianetics &quot;a milestone for man comparable to his discovery of fire and superior to his invention of the wheel and the arch,&quot; It was an immediate commercial success and sparked what Martin Gardner calls &quot;a nation-wide cult of incredible proportions&quot;.186 By August 1950, Hubbard's book had sold 55,000 copies, was selling at the rate of 4,000 a week and was being translated into French, German and Japanese. Five hundred Dianetic auditing groups had been set up across the United States.187
Dianetics was poorly received by the press and the scientific and medical professions.188 The American Psychological Association criticized Hubbard's claims as &quot;not supported by empirical evidence&quot;.189 Scientific American said that Hubbard's book contained &quot;more promises and less evidence per page than any publication since the invention of printing&quot;,190 while The New Republic called it a &quot;bold and immodest mixture of complete nonsense and perfectly reasonable common sense, taken from long acknowledged findings and disguised and distorted by a crazy, newly invented terminology&quot;.191 Some of Hubbard's fellow science fiction writers also criticized it; Isaac Asimov considered it &quot;gibberish&quot;192 while Jack Williamson called it &quot;a lunatic revision of Freudian psychology&quot;.193
Several famous individuals became involved with Dianetics. Aldous Huxley received auditing from Hubbard himself,194 the poet Jean Toomer195 and the science fiction writers Theodore Sturgeon196 and A. E. van Vogt became trained Dianetics auditors. Van Vogt temporarily abandoned writing and became the head of the newly-established Los Angeles branch of the Hubbard Dianetic Research Foundation. Other branches were established in New York, Washington D.C., Chicago and Honolulu.197
Although Dianetics was not cheap, a great many people were nonetheless willing to pay; van Vogt later recalled &quot;doing little but tear open envelopes and pull out $500 checks from people who wanted to take an auditor's course.&quot;198 Financial controls were lax. Hubbard himself withdrew large sums with no explanation of what he was doing with it. On one occasion, van Vogt saw Hubbard taking a lump sum of $56,000 (equivalent to $0.5 million at 2010 prices) out of the Los Angeles Foundation's proceeds.199 One of Hubbard's employees, Helen O'Brien, commented that at the Elizabeth, N.J. branch of the Foundation the books showed that &quot;a month's income of $90,000 is listed, with only $20,000 accounted for.&quot;200
Hubbard played a very active role in the Dianetics boom, writing, lecturing and training auditors. Many of those who knew him spoke of being impressed by his personal charisma. Jack Horner, who became a Dianetics auditor in 1950, later said: &quot;He was very impressive, dedicated and amusing. The man had tremendous charisma; you just wanted to hear every word he had to say and listen for any pearl of wisdom.&quot;201 Isaac Asimov recalled in his autobiography how at a dinner party he, Robert Heinlein, L. Sprague de Camp and their wives &quot;all sat as quietly as pussycats and listened to Hubbard. He told tales with perfect aplomb and in complete paragraphs.&quot;202 As Atack comments, he was &quot;a charismatic figure who compelled the devotion of those around him.&quot;203 Christopher Evans described the personal qualities that Hubbard brought to Dianetics and Scientology:
Hubbard's supporters soon began to have doubts about Dianetics. Winter became disillusioned and wrote that he had never seen a single convincing Clear: &quot;I have seen some individuals who are supposed to have been 'clear,' but their behavior does not conform to the definition of the state. Moreover, an individual supposed to have been 'clear' has undergone a relapse into conduct which suggests an incipient psychosis.&quot;204 He also deplored the Foundation's omission of any serious scientific research.205 Dianetics lost public credibility in August 1950 when a presentation by Hubbard before an audience of 6,000 at the Shrine Auditorium in Los Angeles failed disastrously.206 He introduced a Clear named Sonya Bianca and told the audience that as a result of undergoing Dianetic therapy she now possessed perfect recall. However, Gardner writes, &quot;in the demonstration that followed, she failed to remember a single formula in physics (the subject in which she was majoring) or the color of Hubbard's tie when his back was turned. At this point, a large part of the audience got up and left.&quot;207
Hubbard also faced other practitioners moving into leadership positions within the Dianetics community. It was structured as an open, public practice in which others were free to pursue their own lines of research and claim that their approaches to auditing produced better results than Hubbard's.208 The community rapidly splintered and its members mingled Hubbard's ideas with a wide variety of esoteric and even occult practices.209 By late 1950, the Elizabeth, N.J. Foundation was in financial crisis and the Los Angeles Foundation was more than $200,000 in debt.210 Winter and Art Ceppos, the publisher of Hubbard's book, resigned in acrimonious circumstances.211 Campbell also resigned, criticizing Hubbard for being impossible to work with, and blamed him for the disorganization and financial ruin of the Foundations.212 By the summer of 1951, the Elizabeth, N.J. Foundation and all of its branches had closed.213
The collapse of Hubbard's marriage to Sara created yet more problems. He had begun an affair with his 20-year-old public relations assistant in late 1950, while Sara started a relationship with Dianetics auditor Miles Hollister.214 Hubbard secretly denounced the couple to the FBI in March 1951, portraying them in a letter as Communist infiltrators. According to Hubbard, Sara was &quot;currently intimate with [Communists] but evidently under coercion. Drug addiction set in fall 1950. Nothing of this known to me until a few weeks ago.&quot; Hollister was described as having a &quot;sharp chin, broad forehead, rather Slavic&quot;. He was said to be the &quot;center of most turbulence in our organization&quot; and &quot;active and dangerous&quot;.215 The FBI did not take Hubbard seriously and annotated his correspondence with the comment: &quot;Appears mental&quot;.216
Three weeks later, Hubbard and two Foundation staff seized Sara and his year-old daughter Alexis and forcibly took them to San Bernardino, California, where he attempted unsuccessfully to find a doctor to examine Sara and declare her insane.217 He let Sara go but took Alexis to Havana, Cuba. Sara filed a divorce suit on April 23, 1951 that accused him of marrying her bigamously and subjecting her to sleep deprivation, beatings, strangulation, kidnapping and exhortations to commit suicide.218 The case led to newspaper headlines such as &quot;Ron Hubbard Insane, Says His Wife.&quot;219 Sara finally secured the return of her daughter in June 1951 by agreeing to a settlement with her husband in which she signed a statement, written by him, declaring:
Dianetics appeared to be on the edge of total collapse. However, it was saved by Don Purcell, a millionaire businessman and Dianeticist who agreed to support a new Foundation in Wichita, Kansas. Their collaboration ended after less than a year when they fell out over the future direction of Dianetics.220 The Wichita Foundation became financially unviable after a court ruled that it was liable for the unpaid debts of its defunct predecessor in Elizabeth, N.J. The ruling prompted Purcell and the other directors of the Wichita Foundation to file for voluntary bankruptcy in February 1952.221 Hubbard resigned immediately and accused Purcell of having been bribed by the American Medical Association to destroy Dianetics.222 Hubbard established a &quot;Hubbard College&quot; on the other side of town where he continued to promote Dianetics while fighting Purcell in the courts over the Foundation's intellectual property.223
Only six weeks after setting up the Hubbard College and marrying a staff member, 18-year-old Mary Sue Whipp, Hubbard closed it down and moved with his new bride to Phoenix, Arizona. He established a Hubbard Association of Scientologists to promote his new &quot;Science of Certainty&quot; &lt;U+2013&gt; Scientology.224
Rise of Scientology
 The Church of Scientology attributes its genesis to Hubbard's discovery of &quot;a new line of research&quot;, first set out in his book Science of Survival &lt;U+2013&gt; &quot;that man is most fundamentally a spiritual being&quot;.225 Non-Scientologist writers have suggested alternative motives: that he aimed &quot;to reassert control over his creation&quot;,226 that he believed &quot;he was about to lose control of Dianetics&quot;,227 or that he wanted to ensure &quot;he would be able to stay in business even if the courts eventually awarded control of Dianetics and its valuable copyrights to ... the hated Don Purcell.&quot;228
Hubbard expanded upon the basics of Dianetics to construct a spiritually-oriented (though at this stage not religious) doctrine based on the concept that the true self of a person was a thetan &lt;U+2013&gt; an immortal, omniscient and potentially omnipotent entity.229 Hubbard taught that the thetans, having created the material universe, had forgotten their god-like powers and become trapped in physical bodies.230 Scientology aimed to &quot;rehabilitate&quot; each person's thetan to restore its original capacities and become once again an &quot;Operating Thetan&quot;.231232 Hubbard insisted humanity was imperiled by the forces of &quot;aberration&quot;, which were the result of engrams carried by the immortal thetans for billions of years.233
Hubbard introduced a device called an E-meter that he presented as having, as Miller puts it, &quot;an almost mystical power to reveal an individual's innermost thoughts.&quot;234 He promulgated Scientology through a series of lectures, bulletins and books such as A History of Man (&quot;a cold-blooded and factual account of your last sixty trillion years&quot;)235 and Scientology: 8-8008 (&quot;With this book, the ability to make one's body old or young at will, the ability to heal the ill without physical contact, the ability to cure the insane and the incapacitated, is set forth for the physician, the layman, the mathematician and the physicist.&quot;)236
Scientology was organized in a very different way to the decentralized Dianetics movement. The Hubbard Association of Scientologists (HAS) was the only official Scientology organization. Training procedures and doctrines were standardized and promoted through HAS publications, and administrators and auditors were not permitted to deviate from Hubbard's approach.237 Branches or &quot;orgs&quot; were organized as franchises, rather like a fast food restaurant chain. Each franchise holder was required to pay ten per cent of income to Hubbard's central organization. They were expected to find new recruits, known as &quot;raw meat&quot;, but were restricted to providing only basic services. Costlier higher-level auditing was only provided by Hubbard's central organization.238
Although this model would eventually be extremely successful, Scientology was a very small-scale movement at first. Hubbard started off with only a few dozen followers, generally dedicated Dianeticists; a seventy-hour series of lectures in Philadelphia in December 1952 was attended by just 38 people.239 Hubbard also traveled to the United Kingdom to establish his control over a Dianetics group in London. It was very much a shoestring operation; as Helen O'Brien later recalled, &quot;there was an atmosphere of extreme poverty and undertones of a grim conspiracy over all. At 163 Holland Park Avenue was an ill-lit lecture room and a bare-boarded and poky office some eight by ten feet &lt;U+2013&gt; mainly infested by long haired men and short haired and tatty women.&quot;240 On September 24, 1952, only a few weeks after arriving in London, Hubbard's wife Mary Sue gave birth to her first child, a daughter whom they named Diana Meredith de Wolfe Hubbard.241
In February 1953, Hubbard acquired a doctorate from Sequoia University. According to a Scientology biography, this was &quot;given in recognition of his outstanding work on Dianetics&quot; and &quot;as an inspiration to the many people ... who had been inspired by him to take up advanced studies in this field...&quot;&quot;242 The British government concluded in the 1970s that Sequoia University was a &quot;degree mill&quot; operated by Joseph Hough, a Los Angeles chiropractor.243 Miller cites a telegram sent by Hubbard on February 27, 1953 in which he instructed Scientologist Richard de Mille to procure him a Ph.D from Hough urgently &lt;U+2013&gt; &quot;FOR GOSH SAKES EXPEDITE. WORK HERE UTTERLY DEPENDANT ON IT.&quot;244 Hough's &quot;university&quot; was closed down by the Californian authorities in 1971. British government officials noted in a report written in 1977: &quot;It has not and never had any authority whatsoever to issue diplomas or degrees and the dean is sought by the authorities 'for questioning'.&quot;245
A few weeks after becoming &quot;Dr.&quot; Hubbard, he wrote to Helen O'Brien &lt;U+2013&gt; who had taken over the day-to-day management of Scientology in the United States &lt;U+2013&gt; proposing that Scientology should be transformed into a religion.246 As membership declined and finances grew tighter, Hubbard had reversed the hostility to religion he voiced in Dianetics.247 His letter to O'Brien discussed the legal and financial benefits of religious status.248 The idea may not have been new; Hubbard has been quoted as telling an authors' convention in 1948, &quot;Writing for a penny a word is ridiculous. If a man really wants to make a million dollars, the best way would be to start his own religion.&quot;249250251 The Church of Scientology has denied that Hubbard said and insists that it is a misattributed quote that was said instead by George Orwell.252 Hubbard outlined plans for setting up a chain of &quot;Spiritual Guidance Centers&quot; charging customers $500 for twenty-four hours of auditing (&quot;That is real money... Charge enough and we'd be swamped.&quot;). He wrote:
O'Brien was not enthusiastic and resigned the following September, worn out by work.253 She criticized Hubbard for creating &quot;a temperate zone voodoo, in its inelasticity, unexplainable procedures, and mindless group euphoria.&quot;254 He nonetheless pressed ahead and on December 18, 1953, he incorporated the Church of Scientology, Church of American Science and Church of Spiritual Engineering in Camden, New Jersey.255 Hubbard, his wife Mary Sue and his secretary John Galusha became the trustees of all three corporations.256 Hubbard later denied founding the Church of Scientology and to this day, Scientologists maintain that the &quot;founding church&quot; was actually the Church of Scientology of California, established on February 18, 1954 by Scientologist Burton Farber.257 The reason for Scientology's religious transformation was explained by officials of the HAS:
Scientology franchises became Churches of Scientology and some auditors began dressing as clergymen, complete with clerical collars. If they were arrested in the course of their activities, Hubbard advised, they should sue for massive damages for molesting &quot;a Man of God going about his business.&quot;258 A few years later he told Scientologists: &quot;If attacked on some vulnerable point by anyone or anything or any organization, always find or manufacture enough threat against them to cause them to sue for peace ... Don't ever defend, always attack.&quot;259 Any individual breaking away from Scientology and setting up his own group was to be shut down:
The 1950s saw Scientology growing steadily. Hubbard finally achieved victory over Don Purcell in 1954 when the latter, worn out by constant litigation, handed the copyrights of Dianetics back to Hubbard.260 Most of the formerly independent Scientology and Dianetics groups were either driven out of business or were absorbed into Hubbard's organizations.261 Hubbard marketed Scientology through medical claims, such as attracting polio sufferers by presenting the Church of Scientology as a scientific research foundation investigating polio cases.262 One advertisement during this period stated:
Scientology became a highly profitable enterprise for Hubbard.263 He implemented a scheme under which he was paid a percentage of the Church of Scientology's gross income and by 1957 he was being paid about $250,000 annually &lt;U+2013&gt; equivalent to $1.9 million at 2010 prices.264 His family grew, too, with Mary Sue giving birth to three more children &lt;U+2013&gt; Geoffrey Quentin McCaully on January 6, 1954,265 Mary Suzette Rochelle on February 13, 1955266 and Arthur Ronald Conway on June 6, 1958.267 In the spring of 1959, he used his newfound wealth to purchase Saint Hill Manor, an 18th century country house in Sussex formerly owned by Sawai Man Singh II, the Maharaja of Jaipur. The house became Hubbard's permanent residence and an international training center for Scientologists.268
Controversies and crisis
By the start of the 1960s, Hubbard was the leader of a worldwide movement with thousands of followers. A decade later, however, he had left Saint Hill Manor and moved aboard his own private fleet of ships as the Church of Scientology faced worldwide controversy.
The Church of Scientology says that the problems of this period were due to &quot;vicious, covert international attacks&quot; by the United States government, &quot;all of which were proven false and baseless, which were to last 27 years and finally culminated in the Government being sued for 750 million dollars for conspiracy.&quot;269 Behind the attacks, claimed Hubbard, lay a vast conspiracy of &quot;psychiatric front groups&quot; secretly controlling governments: &quot;Every single lie, false charge and attack on Scientology has been traced directly to this group&lt;U+2019&gt;s members. They have sought at great expense for nineteen years to crush and eradicate any new development in the field of the mind. They are actively preventing any effectiveness in this field.&quot;270
Hubbard believed that Scientology was being infiltrated by saboteurs and spies and introduced &quot;security checking&quot;271 to identify those he termed &quot;potential trouble sources&quot; and &quot;suppressive persons&quot;. Members of the Church of Scientology were interrogated with the aid of E-meters and were asked questions such as &quot;Have you ever practiced homosexuality?&quot; and &quot;Have you ever had unkind thoughts about L. Ron Hubbard?&quot;272 For a time, Scientologists were even interrogated about crimes committed in past lives: &quot;Have you ever destroyed a culture?&quot; &quot;Did you come to Earth for evil purposes?&quot; &quot;Have you ever zapped anyone?&quot;273
He also sought to exert political influence, advising Scientologists to vote against Richard Nixon in the 1960 presidential election and establishing a Department of Government Affairs &quot;to bring government and hostile philosophies or societies into a state of complete compliance with the goals of Scientology.&quot; This, he said, &quot;is done by high-level ability to control and in its absence by a low-level ability to overwhelm. Introvert such agencies. Control such agencies.&quot;274
The U.S. Government was already well aware of Hubbard's activities. The FBI had a lengthy file on him and regarded him as &quot;a mental case&quot;.275 Police forces in a number of jurisdictions began exchanging information about Scientology through the auspices of Interpol, which eventually led to prosecutions.276 In 1958, the U.S. Internal Revenue Service withdrew the Washington, D.C. Church of Scientology's tax exemption after it found that Hubbard and his family were profiting unreasonably from Scientology's ostensibly non-profit income.277 The Food and Drug Administration took action against Scientology's medical claims, seizing thousands of pills being marketed as &quot;radiation cures&quot;278 as well as publications and E-meters. The Church of Scientology was required to label them as being &quot;ineffective in the diagnosis or treatment of disease.&quot;279
Following the FDA's actions, Scientology attracted increasingly unfavorable publicity across the English-speaking world.280 It faced particularly hostile scrutiny in Victoria, Australia, where it was accused of brainwashing, blackmail, extortion and damaging the mental health of its members.281 The Victorian state government established a Board of Inquiry into Scientology in November 1963.282 Its report, published in October 1965, condemned every aspect of Scientology and Hubbard himself. He was described as being of doubtful sanity, having a persecution complex and displaying strong indications of paranoid schizophrenia with delusions of grandeur. His writings were characterized as nonsensical, abounding in &quot;self-glorification and grandiosity, replete with histrionics and hysterical, incontinent outbursts&quot;.283 Sociologist Roy Wallis comments that the report drastically changed public perceptions of Scientology:
The report led to Scientology being banned in Victoria,284 Western Australia and South Australia,285 and led to more negative publicity around the world. Newspapers and politicians in the U.K. pressed the British government for action against Scientology. In July 1968, the British Minister of Health, Kenneth Robinson, announced that foreign Scientologists would no longer be permitted to enter the U.K. and Hubbard himself was excluded from the country as an &quot;undesirable alien.&quot;286 Further inquiries were launched in Canada, New Zealand and South Africa.287
Hubbard took three major new initiatives in the face of these challenges. &quot;Ethics Technology&quot; was introduced to tighten internal discipline within Scientology. It required Scientologists to &quot;disconnect&quot; from any organization or individual &lt;U+2013&gt; including family members &lt;U+2013&gt; deemed to be disruptive or &quot;suppressive&quot;.288 Scientologists were also required to write &quot;Knowledge Reports&quot; on each other, reporting transgressions or misapplications of Scientology methods. Hubbard promulgated a long list of punishable &quot;Misdemenors,&quot; &quot;Crimes&quot; and &quot;High Crimes&quot;.289 The &quot;Fair Game&quot; policy was introduced, which was applicable to anyone deemed an &quot;enemy&quot; of Scientology: &quot;May be deprived of property or injured by any means by any Scientologist without any discipline of the Scientologist. May be tricked, sued or lied to or destroyed.&quot;290291
At the start of March 1966, Hubbard created the Guardian's Office (GO), a new agency within the Church of Scientology that was headed by his wife Mary Sue.292 It dealt with Scientology's external affairs, including public relations, legal actions and the gathering of intelligence on perceived threats.293 As Scientology faced increasingly negative media attention, the GO retaliated with hundreds of writs for libel and slander; it issued more than forty on a single day.294 Hubbard ordered his staff to find &quot;lurid, blood sex crime actual evidence [sic] on [Scientology's] attackers.&quot;295
Finally, at the end of 1966, Hubbard acquired his own fleet of ships.296 He established the &quot;Hubbard Explorational Company Ltd&quot; which purchased three ships &lt;U+2013&gt; the Enchanter, a forty-ton schooner,297 the Avon River, an old trawler,298 and the Royal Scotman [sic], a former Irish Sea cattle ferry that he made his home and flagship.299 The ships were crewed by the Sea Organization or &quot;Sea Org,&quot; a group of Scientologist volunteers, with the support of a couple of professional seamen.300301
Commodore of the Sea Organization
 After Hubbard took command of the Sea Org fleet in early 1967 it began an eight-year voyage, sailing from port to port in the Mediterranean Sea and eastern North Atlantic. The fleet traveled as far as Corfu in the eastern Mediterranean and Dakar and the Azores in the Atlantic, but rarely stayed anywhere for longer than six weeks. Ken Urquhart, Hubbard's personal assistant at the time, later recalled:
When Hubbard established the Sea Org he publicly declared that he had relinquished his management responsibilities. According to Miller, this was not true. He received daily telex messages from Scientology organizations around the world reporting their statistics and income. The Church of Scientology sent him $15,000 a week and millions of dollars were transferred to his bank accounts in Switzerland and Liechtenstein.302 Couriers arrived regularly, conveying luxury food for Hubbard and his family303 or cash that had been smuggled from England to avoid currency export restrictions.304
Along the way, Hubbard sought to establish a safe haven in &quot;a friendly little country where Scientology would be allowed to prosper,&quot; as Miller puts it.305 The fleet stayed at Corfu for several months in 1968-69. Hubbard renamed the ships after Greek gods &lt;U+2013&gt; the Royal Scotman was rechristened Apollo &lt;U+2013&gt; and he praised the recently established military dictatorship.306 The Sea Org was represented as &quot;Professor Hubbard's Philosophy School&quot; in a telegram to the Greek government.307 In March 1969, however, Hubbard and his ships were ordered to leave.308 In mid-1972, Hubbard tried again in Morocco, establishing contacts with the country's secret police and training senior policemen and intelligence agents in techniques for detecting subversives.309 The program ended in failure when it became caught up in internal Moroccan politics, and Hubbard left the country hastily in December 1972.310
At the same time, Hubbard was still developing Scientology's doctrines. A Scientology biography states that &quot;free of organizational duties and aided by the first Sea Org members, L. Ron Hubbard now had the time and facilities to confirm in the physical universe some of the events and places he had encountered in his journeys down the track of time.&quot;311 In 1965, he designated several existing Scientology courses as confidential, repackaging them as the first of the esoteric &quot;OT levels&quot;.312 Two years later he announced the release of OT3, the &quot;Wall of Fire&quot;, revealing the secrets of an immense disaster that had occurred &quot;on this planet, and on the other seventy-five planets which form this Confederacy, seventy-five million years ago.&quot;313 Scientologists were required to undertake the first two OT levels before learning how Xenu, the leader of the Galactic Confederacy, had shipped billions of people to Earth and blown them up with hydrogen bombs, following which their traumatized spirits were stuck together at &quot;implant stations&quot;, brainwashed with false memories and eventually became contained within human beings.314 The discovery of OT3 was said to have taken a major physical toll on Hubbard, who announced that he had broken a knee, an arm, and his back during the course of his research.315 A year later, in 1968, he unveiled OT levels 4 to 6 and began delivering OT training courses to Scientologists aboard the Royal Scotman.316
Scientologists around the world were presented with a glamorous picture of life in the Sea Org and many applied to join Hubbard aboard the fleet.317 What they found was rather different from the image. Most of those joining had no nautical experience at all.318 Mechanical difficulties and blunders by the crews led to a series of embarrassing incidents and near-disasters. Following one incident in which the rudder of the Royal Scotman was damaged during a storm, Hubbard ordered the ship's entire crew to be reduced to a &quot;condition of liability&quot; and wear gray rags tied to their arms.319 The ship itself was treated the same way, with dirty tarpaulins tied around its funnel to symbolize its lower status. According to those aboard, conditions were appalling; the crew was worked to the point of exhaustion, given meagre rations and forbidden to wash or change their clothes for several weeks.320 Hubbard maintained a harsh disciplinary regime aboard the fleet, punishing mistakes by confining people in the Royal Scotman's bilge tanks without toilet facilities and with food provided in buckets.321 At other times erring crew members were thrown overboard with Hubbard looking on and, occasionally, filming.322 David Mayo, a Sea Org member at the time, later recalled:
From about 1970, Hubbard was attended aboard ship by the children of Sea Org members, organized as the Commodore's Messenger Organization (CMO). They were mainly young girls dressed in hot pants and halter tops, who were responsible for running errands for Hubbard such as lighting his cigarettes, dressing him or relaying his verbal commands to other members of the crew.323324 In addition to his wife Mary Sue, he was accompanied by all four of his children by her, though not his first son Nibs, who had defected from Scientology in late 1959.325 The younger Hubbards were all members of the Sea Org and shared its rigors, though Quentin Hubbard reportedly found it difficult to adjust and attempted suicide in mid-1974.326
Life in hiding
 During the 1970s Hubbard faced an increasing number of legal threats. French prosecutors charged him and the French Church of Scientology with fraud and customs violations in 1972. He was advised that he was at risk of being extradited to France.327 Hubbard left the Sea Org fleet temporarily at the end of 1972, living incognito in Queens, New York328 until he returned to his flagship in September 1973 when the threat of extradition had abated.329 Scientology sources say that he carried out &quot;a sociological study in and around New York City.&quot;330
Hubbard's health deteriorated significantly during this period. A chain-smoker, he also suffered from bursitis and excessive weight, and had a prominent growth on his forehead.331 He suffered serious injuries in a motorcycle accident in 1973 and had a heart attack in 1975 that required him to take anticoagulant drugs for the next year.332 In September 1978 Hubbard had a pulmonary embolism, falling into a coma, but recovered.333
He remained active in managing and developing Scientology, establishing the controversial Rehabilitation Project Force in 1974334 and issuing policy and doctrinal bulletins.335 However, the Sea Org's voyages were coming to an end. The Apollo was banned from several Spanish ports336 and was expelled from Cura&lt;U+00E7&gt;ao in October 1975.337 The Sea Org came to be suspected of being a CIA operation, leading to a riot in Funchal, Madeira when the Apollo docked there. Hubbard decided to relocate back to the United States to establish a &quot;land base&quot; for the Sea Org in Florida.338 The Church of Scientology attributes this decision to the activities on the Apollo having &quot;outgrow[n] the ship's capacity.&quot;339
In October 1975 Hubbard moved into a hotel suite in Daytona Beach. The Fort Harrison Hotel in Clearwater, Florida was secretly acquired as the location for the &quot;land base&quot;.340 On December 5, 1975, Hubbard and his wife Mary Sue moved into a condominium complex in nearby Dunedin.341 Their presence was meant to be a closely-guarded secret but was accidentally compromised the following month.342 Hubbard immediately left Dunedin and moved to Georgetown, Washington D.C., accompanied by a handful of aides and Messengers but not his wife.343 Six months later, following another security alert in July 1976, Hubbard moved to another safe house in Culver City, California. He lived there for only about three months, relocating in October to the more private confines of the Olive Tree Ranch near La Quinta.344 His second son Quentin committed suicide a few weeks later in Las Vegas.345346
Throughout this period, Hubbard was heavily involved in directing the activities of the Guardian's Office (GO), the legal bureau/intelligence agency that he had established in 1966. He believed that Scientology was being attacked by an international Nazi conspiracy, which he termed the &quot;Tenyaka Memorial&quot;, through a network of drug companies, banks and psychiatrists in a bid to take over the world.347 In 1973 he instigated the &quot;Snow White Program&quot; and directed the GO to remove negative reports about Scientology from government files and track down their sources.348 The GO was ordered to &quot;get all false and secret files on Scientology, LRH ... that cannot be obtained legally, by all possible lines of approach ... i.e., job penetration, janitor penetration, suitable guises utilizing covers.&quot; His involvement in the GO's operations was concealed through the use of codenames. The GO carried out covert campaigns on his behalf such as Operation Bulldozer Leak, intended &quot;to effectively spread the rumor that will lead Government, media, and individual [Suppressive Persons] to conclude that LRH has no control of the C of S and no legal liability for Church activity.&quot; He was kept informed of GO operations, such as the theft of medical records from a hospital, attacks on psychiatrists and infiltrations of organizations that had been critical of Scientology at various time, such as the Better Business Bureau, the American Medical Association, and American Psychiatric Association.349
Members of the GO infiltrated and burglarized numerous government organizations, including the U.S. Department of Justice and the Internal Revenue Service.350 After two GO agents were caught in the Washington, D.C. headquarters of the IRS, the FBI carried out simultaneous raids on GO offices in Los Angeles and Washington, D.C. on July 7, 1977. They retrieved wiretap equipment, burglary tools and some 90,000 pages of incriminating documents. Hubbard was not prosecuted, though he was labeled an &quot;unindicted co-conspirator&quot; by government prosecutors. His wife Mary Sue was indicted and subsequently convicted of conspiracy. She was sent to a federal prison along with ten other Scientologists.351
Hubbard's troubles increased in February 1978 when a French court convicted him in absentia for obtaining money under false pretenses. He was sentenced to four years in prison and a 35,000F ($7,000) fine.352 He went into hiding in April 1979, moving to an apartment in Hemet, California where his only contact with the outside world was via ten trusted Messengers. He cut contact with everyone else, even his wife, whom he saw for the last time in August 1979.353 Hubbard faced a possible indictment for his role in Operation Freakout, the GO's campaign against New York journalist Paulette Cooper, and in February 1980 he disappeared into deep cover in the company of two trusted Messengers, Pat and Anne Broeker.354355
For the first few years of the 1980s, Hubbard and the Broekers lived on the move, touring the Pacific Northwest in a recreational vehicle and living for a while in apartments in Newport Beach and Los Angeles.356 Hubbard used his time in hiding to write his first new works of science fiction for nearly thirty years &lt;U+2013&gt; Battlefield Earth (1982) and Mission Earth, a ten-volume series published between 1985 and 1987.357 They received mixed responses; as writer Jeff Walker puts it, they were &quot;treated derisively by most critics but greatly admired by followers.&quot;358 Hubbard also wrote and composed music for three of his albums, which were produced by the Church of Scientology. The Book soundtrack Space Jazz was released in 1982.359 Mission Earth and The Road to Freedom were released posthumously in 1986.360
In Hubbard's absence, members of the Sea Org staged a takeover of the Church of Scientology and purged many veteran Scientologists. A young Messenger, David Miscavige, became Scientology's de facto leader. Mary Sue Hubbard was forced to resign her position and her daughter Suzette became Miscavige's personal maid.361
Death and legacy
 For the last two years of his life, Hubbard lived in a luxury Blue Bird motorhome on Whispering Winds, a 160-acre ranch near Creston, California. He remained in deep hiding while controversy raged in the outside world about whether he was still alive and if so, where. According to a spokesperson, he spent his time &quot;writing and researching&quot;, pursuing photography and music, overseeing construction work and checking on his animals.362 He repeatedly redesigned the property, spending millions of dollars remodeling the ranch house &lt;U+2013&gt; which went virtually uninhabited &lt;U+2013&gt; and building a quarter-mile horse-racing track with an observation tower, which reportedly was never used.363
He was still closely involved in managing the Church of Scientology via secretly delivered orders364 and continued to receive large amounts of money, of which Forbes magazine estimated &quot;at least $200 million gathered in Hubbard's name through 1982&quot;. In September 1985, the IRS notified the Church that it was considering indicting Hubbard for tax fraud.365
Hubbard suffered further ill-health, including chronic pancreatitis, during his residence at Whispering Winds. He suffered a fatal stroke on January 17, 1986 and died a week later.366 The body was cremated following an autopsy and the ashes were scattered at sea.367 Scientology leaders announced that his body had become an impediment to his work and that he had decided to &quot;drop his body&quot; to continue his research on another planet,368 having &quot;learned how to do it without a body&quot;.369
Hubbard was survived by his wife Mary Sue and all of his children except his second son Quentin. His will provided a trust fund to support Mary Sue; her children Arthur, Diana and Suzette; and Katherine, the daughter of his first wife Polly.370 He disinherited two of his other children.371 L. Ron Hubbard, Jr. had become estranged, changed his name to &quot;Ronald DeWolf&quot; and, in 1982, sued unsuccessfully for control of his father's estate.372 Alexis Valerie, Hubbard's daughter by his second wife Sara, had attempted to contact her father in 1971. She was rebuffed with the implied claim that her real father was Jack Parsons rather than Hubbard, and that her mother had been a Nazi spy during the war.373 Both later accepted settlements when litigation was threatened.374 In 2001, Diana and Suzette were reported to still be Church members, while Arthur had left and become an artist. Hubbard's great-grandson, Jamie DeWolf, is a noted slam poet.375
The copyrights of his works and much of his estate and wealth were willed to the Church of Scientology.376 In a bulletin dated May 5, 1980, Hubbard told his followers to preserve his teachings until an eventual reincarnation when he would return &quot;not as a religious leader but as a political one&quot;.377 The Church of Spiritual Technology (CST), a sister organization of the Church of Scientology, has engraved Hubbard's entire corpus of Scientology and Dianetics texts on steel tablets stored in titanium containers. They are buried at the Trementina Base in a vault under a mountain near Trementina, New Mexico, on top of which the CST's logo has been bulldozed on such a gigantic scale that it is visible from space.378
Hubbard is the Guinness World Record holder for the most published author, with 1,084 works,379 most translated book (70 languages for The Way to Happiness)380 and most audiobooks (185 as of April 2009).381 According to Galaxy Press, Hubbard's Battlefield Earth has sold over 6 million copies and Mission Earth a further 7 million, with each of its ten volumes becoming New York Times bestsellers on their release.382 However, the Los Angeles Times reported in 1990 that Hubbard's followers had been buying large numbers of the books and re-issuing them to stores to boost sales.383 Opinions are divided about his literary legacy. Scientologists have written of their desire to &quot;make Ron the most acclaimed and widely known author of all time&quot;.384 The sociologist William Sims Bainbridge writes that even at his peak in the late 1930s Hubbard was regarded by readers of Astounding Science Fiction as merely &quot;a passable, familiar author but not one of the best&quot;, while by the late 1970s &quot;the [science fiction] subculture wishes it could forget him&quot; and fans gave him a worse rating than any other of the &quot;Golden Age&quot; writers.385
In 2004, eighteen years after Hubbard's death, the Church claimed eight million followers worldwide. According to religious scholar J. Gordon Melton, this is an overestimate, counting as Scientologists people who had merely bought a book.386 The City University of New York's American Religious Identification Survey found that by 2009 only 25,000 Americans identified as Scientologists.387 Hubbard's presence still pervades Scientology. Every Church of Scientology maintains an office reserved for Hubbard, with a desk, chair and writing equipment, ready to be used.388 Lonnie D. Kliever notes that Hubbard was &quot;the only source of the religion, and he has no successor&quot;. Hubbard is referred to simply as &quot;Source&quot; within Scientology and the theological acceptability of any Scientology-related activity is determined by how closely it adheres to Hubbard's doctrines.389 Hubbard's name and signature are official trademarks of the Religious Technology Center, established in 1982 to control and oversee the use of Hubbard's works and Scientology's trademarks and copyrights. The RTC is the central organization within Scientology's complex corporate hierarchy and has put much effort into re-checking the accuracy of all Scientology publications to &quot;ensur[e] the availability of the pure unadulterated writings of Mr. Hubbard to the coming generations&quot;390
The Danish historian of religions Mikael Rothstein describes Scientology as &quot;a movement focused on the figure of Hubbard.&quot; He comments: &quot;The fact that [Hubbard's] life is mythologized is as obvious as in the cases of Jesus, Muhammad or Siddartha Gotama. This is how religion works. Scientology, however, rejects this analysis altogether, and goes to great lengths to defend every detail of Hubbard's amazing and fantastic life as plain historical fact.&quot; Hubbard is presented as &quot;the master of a multitude of disciplines&quot; who performed extraordinary feats as a photographer, composer, scientist, therapist, explorer, navigator, philosopher, poet, artist, humanitarian, adventurer, soldier, scout, musician and many other fields of endeavor.391 The Church of Scientology portrays Hubbard's life and work as having proceeded seamlessly, &quot;as if they were a continuous set of predetermined events and discoveries that unfolded through his lifelong research&quot; even up to and beyond his death.392
According to Rothstein's assessment of Hubbard's legacy, Scientology consciously aims to transfer the charismatic authority of Hubbard to institutionalize his authority over the organization, even after his death. Hubbard is presented as a virtually superhuman religious ideal just as Scientology itself is presented as the most important development in human history.393 As Rothstein puts it, &quot;reverence for Scientology's scripture is reverence for Hubbard, the man who in the Scientological perspective single-handedly brought salvation to all human beings.&quot;394 David G. Bromley of the University of Virginia comments that the real Hubbard has been transformed into a &quot;prophetic persona&quot;, &quot;LRH&quot;, which acts as the basis for his prophetic authority within Scientology and transcends his biographical history.395
Biographies
 The Church of Scientology has not yet published a comprehensive official biography of Hubbard.396 During his lifetime, a number of brief biographical sketches were published in his Scientology books. The Church of Scientology issued &quot;the only authorized LRH Biography&quot; in October 1977.397 His life was illustrated in print in What Is Scientology?, a glossy publication published in 1978 with paintings of Hubbard's life contributed by his son Arthur.398
Following Hubbard's death, Bridge Publications has published several stand-alone biographical accounts of his life, notably The Ron Series, dedicated to various aspects of Hubbard's life and work. Marco Frenschkowski notes that &quot;non-Scientologist readers immediately recognize some parts of Hubbard's life are here systematically left out: no information whatsoever is given about his private life (his marriages, divorces, children), his legal affairs and so on.&quot;399 The Church maintains an extensive website presenting the official version of Hubbard's life.400 It also owns a number of properties dedicated to Hubbard including the Los Angeles-based L. Ron Hubbard Life Exhibition, a presentation of Hubbard's life, and the Author Services Center, dedicated to Hubbard's writings,401 and the L. Ron Hubbard House in Washington, D.C.
In the late 1970s two men began to assemble a very different picture of Hubbard's life. Michael Linn Shannon, a resident of Portland, Oregon, became interested in Hubbard's life story after an encounter with a Scientology recruiter. Over the next four years he collected previously undisclosed records and documents on Hubbard's life. He intended to write an expos&lt;U+00E9&gt; of Hubbard and sent a copy of his findings and key records to a number of contacts, but was unable to find a publisher.402
Shannon's findings were acquired by Gerry Armstrong, a Scientologist who had been appointed Hubbard's official archivist.403 He had been given the job of assembling documents relating to Hubbard's life for the purpose of helping Omar V. Garrison, a non-Scientologist who had written two books sympathetic to Scientology, to write an official biography. However, the documents that he uncovered convinced both Armstrong and Garrison that Hubbard had systematically misrepresented his life. Garrison refused to write a &quot;puff piece&quot; and declared that he would not &quot;repeat all the falsehoods they [the Church of Scientology] had perpetuated over the years.&quot; He wrote a &quot;warts and all&quot; biography while Armstrong quit Scientology, taking five boxes of papers with him. The Church of Scientology and Mary Sue Hubbard sued for the return of the documents while settling out of court with Garrison, requiring him to turn over the nearly-completed manuscript of the biography.404 In October 1984 Judge Paul G. Breckenridge ruled in Armstrong's favor, saying:
In November 1987, the British journalist and writer Russell Miller published Bare-faced Messiah, the first full-length biography of L. Ron Hubbard. He drew on Armstrong's papers, official records and interviews with those who had known Hubbard including ex-Scientologists and family members. The book was well-received by reviewers but the Church of Scientology sought unsuccessfully to prohibit its publication on the grounds of copyright infringement.405 Other critical biographical accounts are found in L. Ron Hubbard, Messiah or Madman? (1987) by Bent Corydon, A Piece of Blue Sky (1990) by Jon Atack and Inside Scientology: The Story of America's Most Secretive Religion (2011) by Janet Reitman.
Bibliography
According to the Church of Scientology, Hubbard produced some 65 million words on Dianetics and Scientology, contained in about 500,000 pages of written material, 3,000 recorded lectures and 100 films. His works of fiction included some 500 novels and short stories.406
Notes
References
Atack, Jon. A Piece of Blue Sky: Scientology, Dianetics, and L. Ron Hubbard exposed. Carol Publishing Group, 1990. ISBN 978-0-8184-0499-3, 
Bromley, David G. &quot;Making Sense of Scientology: Prophetic, Contractual Religion&quot;, in Lewis, James R. (ed.), Scientology. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2009. ISBN 978-0-19-533149-3 
Christensen, Dorthe Refslund. &quot;Inventing L. Ron Hubbard: On the Construction and Maintenance of the Hagiographic Mythology of Scientology's Founder&quot;, pp. 227&lt;U+2013&gt;258 in Lewis, James R.; Petersen, Jesper Aagaard: Controversial new religions. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2005. ISBN 978-0-19-515683-6, , available through Oxford Scholarship Online, doi:10.1093/019515682X.003.0011
Evans, Christopher. Cults of Unreason. New York: Farrar, Straus and Giroux, 1974. ISBN 0-374-13324-7, 
Gardner, Martin. Fads and fallacies in the name of science. New York: Courier Dover Publications, 1957. ISBN 978-0-486-20394-2, 
Lamont, Stewart. Religion, Inc.: the Church of Scientology. London: Harrap, 1986. ISBN 978-0-245-54334-0, 
Malko, George. Scientology: The Now Religion. New York: Delacorte Press, 1970. 
Miller, Russell. Bare-faced Messiah: the true story of L. Ron Hubbard. London: Joseph, 1987. ISBN 0-7181-2764-1, 
O'Brien, Helen. Dianetics in Limbo: A Documentary About Immortality. Philadelphia: Whitmore Publishing, 1966. 
Pendle, George. Strange Angel: The Otherworldly Life of Rocket Scientist John Whiteside Parsons. Orlando, FL: Houghton Mifflin Harcourt, 2006. ISBN 978-0-15-603179-0, 
Reitman, Janet. &quot;Inside Scientology&quot;, pp. 305&lt;U+2013&gt;348 of American Society of Magazine Editors (Ed.) The Best American Magazine Writing 2007. New York: Columbia University Press, 2007. ISBN 978-0-231-14391-2, 
Rolph, Cecil Hewitt Believe What You Like: what happened between the Scientologists and the National Association for Mental Health. London: Deutsch, 1973. ISBN 978-0-233-96375-4, 
Rothstein, Mikael. &quot;Scientology, scripture and sacred traditions&quot;, in Lewis, James R.; Hammer, Olav (eds.): The invention of sacred tradition. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 2007. ISBN 978-0-521-86479-4, 
Streeter, Michael. Behind closed doors: the power and influence of secret societies. London: New Holland Publishers, 2008. ISBN 978-1-84537-937-7, 
Streissguth, Thomas. Charismatic cult leaders. Minneapolis: The Oliver Press, 1995. ISBN 978-1-881508-18-2, 
Tucker, Ruth A. Another Gospel: Cults, Alternative Religions, and the New Age Movement. Grand Rapids, MI: Zondervan, 2004. ISBN 978-0-310-25937-4, 
Wallis, Roy. The road to total freedom: a sociological analysis of Scientology. New York: Columbia University Press, 1977. ISBN 978-0-231-04200-0, 
Whitehead, Harriet. Renunciation and reformulation: a study of conversion in an American sect. Ithaca, NY: Cornell University Press, 1987. ISBN 978-0-8014-1849-5, 
Winter, Joseph A. A Doctor's Report on Dianetics: Theory and Therapy. New York: Julian Press, 1951. 
External links
Sites run by Church of Scientology International
Official L. Ron Hubbard site
Biographical Profile of L. Ron Hubbard
L. Ron Hubbard: A Chronicle
Publishers' sites
Author Services Inc. Publisher of L. Ron Hubbard's fiction
Bridge Publications Inc. Publisher of L. Ron Hubbard's Scientology and Dianetics works
Writers of the Future A contest founded by L. Ron Hubbard to encourage upcoming fiction and fantasy writers
Unofficial biographies (online)
Bare Faced Messiah by Russell Miller
A Biography of L. Ron Hubbard by Michael Linn Shannon
Further mention of Hubbard
Biographical documentation from The New Yorker
Operation Clambake. Critical material on Hubbard and Scientology
U.S. Government FBI Files for Hubbard via The Smoking Gun
Frenschkowski, Marco, L. Ron Hubbard and Scientology: An annotated bibliographical survey of primary and selected secondary literature, Marburg Journal of Religion, Vol. 1. No. 1. July 1999, ISSN 1612-2941
L. Ron Hubbard at the Internet Book List
af:L. Ron Hubbard ar:&lt;U+0631&gt;&lt;U+0648&gt;&lt;U+0646&gt; &lt;U+0647&gt;&lt;U+0648&gt;&lt;U+0628&gt;&lt;U+0627&gt;&lt;U+0631&gt;&lt;U+062F&gt; be:&lt;U+041B&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+0444&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+0435&gt;&lt;U+0442&gt; &lt;U+0420&gt;&lt;U+043E&gt;&lt;U+043D&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+043B&gt;&lt;U+044C&gt;&lt;U+0434&gt; &lt;U+0425&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+0431&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+0440&gt;&lt;U+0434&gt; be-x-old:&lt;U+041B&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+0444&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+0435&gt;&lt;U+0442&gt; &lt;U+0420&gt;&lt;U+043E&gt;&lt;U+043D&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+043B&gt;&lt;U+044C&gt;&lt;U+0434&gt; &lt;U+0425&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+0431&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+0440&gt;&lt;U+0434&gt; bg:&lt;U+041B&gt;. &lt;U+0420&gt;&lt;U+043E&gt;&lt;U+043D&gt; &lt;U+0425&gt;&lt;U+044A&gt;&lt;U+0431&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+0440&gt;&lt;U+0434&gt; ca:L. Ron Hubbard cs:Lafayette Ronald Hubbard cy:L. Ron Hubbard da:L. Ron Hubbard de:L. Ron Hubbard et:L. Ron Hubbard es:L. Ron Hubbard fr:L. Ron Hubbard it:L. Ron Hubbard he:&lt;U+05DC&gt;. &lt;U+05E8&gt;&lt;U+05D5&gt;&lt;U+05DF&gt; &lt;U+05D4&gt;&lt;U+05D0&gt;&lt;U+05D1&gt;&lt;U+05E8&gt;&lt;U+05D3&gt; lt:Ron Hubbard hu:L. Ron Hubbard nl:L. Ron Hubbard ja:L&lt;U+30FB&gt;&lt;U+30ED&gt;&lt;U+30F3&gt;&lt;U+30FB&gt;&lt;U+30CF&gt;&lt;U+30D0&gt;&lt;U+30FC&gt;&lt;U+30C9&gt; no:L. Ron Hubbard pms:L. Ron Hubbard pl:L. Ron Hubbard pt:L. Ron Hubbard ru:&lt;U+0425&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+0431&gt;&lt;U+0431&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+0440&gt;&lt;U+0434&gt;, &lt;U+041B&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+0444&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+0439&gt;&lt;U+0435&gt;&lt;U+0442&gt; &lt;U+0420&gt;&lt;U+043E&gt;&lt;U+043D&gt;&lt;U+0430&gt;&lt;U+043B&gt;&lt;U+044C&gt;&lt;U+0434&gt; simple:L. Ron Hubbard sl:L. Ron Hubbard fi:L. Ron Hubbard sv:L. Ron Hubbard tr:L. Ron Hubbard zh:L&lt;U+00B7&gt;&lt;U+7F57&gt;&lt;U+6069&gt;&lt;U+00B7&gt;&lt;U+8D3A&gt;&lt;U+4F2F&gt;&lt;U+7279&gt;
Category:1911 births Category:1986 deaths Category:American experimental musicians Category:American fantasy writers Category:American fraudsters Category:American military personnel of World War II Category:American occultists Category:American religious leaders Category:American religious writers Category:American science fiction writers Category:American Scientologists Category:American self-help writers Category:American Thelemites Category:Cardiovascular disease deaths in California Category:Conspiracy theorists Category:Deaths from stroke Category:Eagle Scouts Category:Founders of religions Category:Ig Nobel Prize winners   Category:Musicians from California Category:Neurological disease deaths in the United States Category:Ordo Templi Orientis Category:People convicted of theft Category:People from Madison County, Nebraska Category:Pseudoscientists Category:Pulp fiction writers Category:Religious history of the United States Category:Scientology officials Category:United States Navy officers Category:Western (genre) writers Category:World record holders Category:Writers from Nebraska Category:Persons convicted of fraud
Bromley, p. 89↩
Christensen, p. 228↩
Urban, Hugh B. &quot;Fair Game: Secrecy, Security, and the Church of Scientology in Cold War America.&quot; Journal of the American Academy of Religion 74:2 (2006)↩
Rothstein, p. 21.↩
Hall, Timothy L. American religious leaders, p. 175. New York: Infobase Publishing, 2003. ISBN 978-0-8160-4534-1↩
Miller, p. 11↩
Christensen, pp. 236&lt;U+2013&gt;237↩
Miller, p. 19↩
Tucker, p. 300↩
&quot;About The Author&quot;, in Hubbard, L. Ron: Have you lived before this life?: A scientific survey : a study of death and evidence of past lives, p. 297. Los Angeles: Church of Scientology Publications Organization, 1977. ISBN 978-0-88484-055-8↩
Quoted in Rolph, p. 17↩
&quot;L. Ron Hubbard and American Pulp Fiction&quot;, in Hubbard, L. Ron: &quot;The Great Secret&quot;, p. 107&lt;U+2013&gt;8. Hollywood, CA: Galaxy Press, 2008. ISBN 978-1-59212-371-1↩
Atack, p. 48↩
Sappell, Joel; Welkos, Robert (June 24, 1990). &quot;The Making of L. Ron Hubbard: Creating the Mystique&quot;. Los Angeles Times, p. A38:1↩
Sappell, Joel; Welkos, Robert (June 24, 1990). &quot;The Making of L. Ron Hubbard: Staking a Claim to Blood Brotherhood&quot;. Los Angeles Times, p. A38:5↩
Miller, p. 23↩
Whitehead, p. 46↩
Christensen, p. 238↩
Miller, p. 27↩
Miller, p. 28↩
Christensen, pp. 239&lt;U+2013&gt;240↩
&quot;About the Author&quot;, in Hubbard, L. Ron: Battlefield Earth. (No page number given.) Los Angeles: Galaxy Press, 2005. ISBN 978-1-59212-007-9↩
&quot;Appendix&quot; in Hubbard, L. Ron: Hymn of Asia. (No page number given.) Los Angeles : Church of Scientology of California, Publications Organization, 1974. ISBN 0-88404-035-6↩
Atack, p. 54↩
Miller, p. 31↩
Miller, p. 34↩
Miller, p. 41↩
&quot;L. Ron Hubbard Biographical Profile: Asia and the South Pacific&quot;. Church of Scientology International, 2010, retrieved February 17, 2011.↩
Atack, p. 57↩
Miller, p. 42↩
Miller, p. 43↩
Miller, p. 44↩
Miller, p. 45↩
Miller, p. 46↩
Miller, p. 47↩
Atack, p. 59↩
&quot;A Brief Biography of L. Ron Hubbard&quot;, Ability, Church of Scientology Washington, D.C. Issue 111, January 1959.↩
Malko, p. 31↩
Wallis, p. 18↩
&quot;Foreword&quot;, in Hubbard, L. Ron: Scientology: The Fundamentals of Thought, p. vii. Los Angeles: Bridge Publications, 2007. ISBN 978-1-4031-4420-1↩
Streeter, p. 206↩
L. Ron Hubbard &lt;U+2013&gt; A Chronicle &lt;U+2013&gt; 1930-1940&quot;. Church of Scientology International, 2007, retrieved February 17, 2011.↩
Atack, p. 64↩
Miller, p. 52↩
Miller, p. 54↩
Miller, p. 55↩
L. Ron Hubbard Biographical Profile &lt;U+2013&gt; Caribbean Motion Picture Expedition&quot;. Church of Scientology International, 2010, retrieved February 17, 2011.↩
Hubbard, L. Ron. Mission into Time, p. 7. Copenhagen: AOSH DK Publications Department A/S, 1973. ISBN 8787347563↩
Miller, p. 56↩
Hubbard, L. Ron, &quot;The Camp-Fire&quot;, Adventure magazine, vol. 93 no. 5, October 1, 1935. Quoted in Atack, p. 62↩
Maisel, Albert (December 5, 1950). &quot;Dianetics &lt;U+2013&gt; Science or Hoax?&quot; Look magazine, p. 79↩
Atack, p. 63↩
&quot;L. Ron Hubbard Biographical Profile &lt;U+2013&gt; Puerto Rican Mineralogical Expedition&quot;. Church of Scientology, 2010, retrieved February 8, 2011.↩
The World Factbook &lt;U+2013&gt; Puerto Rico. Central Intelligence Agency, 2011, retrieved February 8, 2011.↩
Miller, p. 56↩
Hubbard, L. Ron. &quot;Creating a Third Dynamic / United Survival Action Clubs&quot;, lecture of December 30, 1957. Ability Congress, 5th lecture.↩
Atack, p. 63↩
L. Ron Hubbard, the writer. Los Angeles, CA : Bridge Publications, 1989. (No page number in original.)↩
Miller, p. 47↩
Miller, p. 63↩
&quot;About L. Ron Hubbard &lt;U+2013&gt; Master Storyteller&quot;. Galaxy Press, 2010, retrieved February 8, 2011.↩
&quot;L. Ron Hubbard Biographical Profile &lt;U+2013&gt; L. Ron Hubbard's Fiction Books&quot;. Church of Scientology International, 2010, retrieved February 8, 2011.↩
Miller, p. 72↩
Asimov, Isaac. In memory yet green: the autobiography of Isaac Asimov, 1920-1954, p. 413. New York: Doubleday, 1979. ISBN 978-0-385-13679-2↩
↩
Stableford, Brian. Historical dictionary of science fiction literature, p. 164. Lanham, MD: Scarecrow Press, 2004. ISBN 978-0-8108-4938-9↩
Miller, p. 86↩
&quot;About the Author&quot; in Hubbard, L. Ron: Dianetics Today, p. 989. Los Angeles: Church of Scientology of California, 1975. ISBN 0-88404-036-4↩
Harmon, Jim; Donald F. Glut. The Great Movie Serials: Their Sound and Fury, p. 329. London: Routledge, 1973. ISBN 978-0-7130-0097-9↩
Hubbard, L. Ron. &quot;The Story of Dianetics and Scientology&quot;, lecture of October 18, 1958↩
Atack, p. 65↩
Miller, p. 69↩
Miller, p. 61↩
Miller, p. 64↩
Miller, p. 70↩
Miller, p. 62↩
Miller, p. 74↩
Miller, p. 71↩
Miller, p. 75↩
Miller, p. 84↩
&quot;L. Ron Hubbard Biographical Profile &lt;U+2013&gt; Founder&quot;. Church of Scientology International, 2010, retrieved February 17, 2011.↩
Gardner, p. 272↩
Atack, p. 66↩
Burks, Arthur J (December 1961). &quot;Excalibur&quot;. The Aberree.↩
Miller, p. 80↩
Ackerman, Forrest J (November 19, 1997) Secret Lives: L. Ron Hubbard. Channel 4 Television.↩
Quoted in Malko, p. 39↩
Miller, p. 85↩
Miller, p. 88↩
Miller, p. 89↩
&quot;L. Ron Hubbard Biographical Profile &lt;U+2013&gt; Alaskan Radio-Experimental Expedition&quot; Church of Scientology International, 2010, retrieved February 17, 2011.↩
Atack, p. 68↩
Miller, p. 89↩
Miller, p. 91↩
Miller, p. 85↩
Miller, p. 91↩
Miller, p. 93↩
Atack, p. 70↩
Lamont, pp. 19&lt;U+2013&gt;20↩
Rolph, p. 16↩
Miller, p. 141↩
Streeter, p. 208↩
Miller, p. 107↩
Atack, p. 81; Streeter, p. 208↩
Atack, p. 84↩
↩
Hubbard, L. Ron. &quot;My Philosophy&quot;, Church of Scientology International, 1965, retrieved February 17, 2011.↩
Miller, p. 125↩
Miller, p. 113↩
Miller, p. 114↩
Miller, p. 117↩
Urban, Hugh B. Magia sexualis: sex, magic, and liberation in modern Western esotericism, p. 137. Berkeley, CA: University of California Press, 2006. ISBN 978-0-520-24776-5↩
Pendle, p. 268↩
Pendle, p. 269↩
Pendle, p. 270↩
&quot;L. Ron Hubbard: A Chronicle 1941-1949&quot;. Church of Scientology International, retrieved February 8, 2011.↩
Atack, p. 90↩
Wright, Lawrence (February 14, 2011).&quot;The Apostate: Paul Haggis vs. the Church of Scientology&quot;. The New Yorker, retrieved February 8, 2011.↩
Miller, p. 134↩
Miller, p. 132↩
Streeter, p. 210↩
Miller, p. 134↩
Miller, p. 139↩
Miller, p. 142↩
&quot;Letters from the Birth of Dianetics.&quot; Church of Scientology International, 2004, retrieved February 8, 2011↩
Miller, p. 143↩
&quot;L. Ron Hubbard &lt;U+2013&gt; A Chronicle: 1941&lt;U+2013&gt;1949&quot; Church of Scientology International, 2007, retrieved February 14, 2011.↩
Miller, p. 144↩
One such letter can be found on the Church of Scientology's official L. Ron Hubbard website. See &quot;Letters from the Birth of Dianetics&quot;, Church of Scientology International, 2004, retrieved February 8, 2011.↩
Luckhurst, Roger. Science Fiction, p. 74. Malden, MA: Polity, 2005. ISBN 978-0-7456-2893-6↩
Atack, p. 106↩
Miller, p. 150↩
Streeter, pp. 210&lt;U+2013&gt;211↩
Atack, p. 108↩
↩
Winter, Joseph A. A Doctor's Report on Dianetics: Theory and Therapy, p. 18. New York: Julian Press, 1951.↩
Quoted in Miller, p. 145↩
Miller, p. 152↩
Atack, p. 107↩
Gardner, p. 265↩
Staff (August 21, 1950). &quot;Dianetics book review; Best Seller.&quot; Newsweek↩
Rabi, Isaac Isador. &quot;Book Review.&quot; Scientific American, January 1951↩
Gumpert, Martin. (August 14, 1950) &quot;Dianetics: book review by Martin Gumpert&quot;. The New Republic↩
Miller, p. 153↩
Atack, p. 113↩
Kerman, Cynthia Earl; Eldridge, Richard. The lives of Jean Toomer: a hunger for wholeness, pp. 317&lt;U+2013&gt;318. Baton Rouge: Louisiana State University Press, 1989. ISBN 978-0-8071-1548-0↩
Sturgeon, Theodore; Williams, Paul. Baby is three, p. 414. Berkeley, CA: North Atlantic Books, 1999. ISBN 978-1-55643-319-1↩
Miller, p. 166↩
O'Brien, p. 27↩
Miller, pp. 159&lt;U+2013&gt;160↩
Atack, p. 377↩
Winter, p. 34↩
Miller, p. 169↩
Whitehead, p. 67↩
Gardner, p. 270↩
Stark, Rodney; Bainbridge, William Sims. The future of religion: secularization, revival, and cult formation, pp. 268&lt;U+2013&gt;269. Berkeley: University of California Press, 1986. ISBN 978-0-520-05731-9↩
Marshall, Gordon. In praise of sociology, p. 186. London: Routledge, 1990. ISBN 978-0-04-445688-9↩
Miller, p. 173↩
Atack, p. 113↩
Miller, p. 170↩
Miller, p. 180↩
Atack, p. 117↩
Martin, Walter Ralston; Zacharias, Ravi K. (ed.). The Kingdom of the Cults, p. 338. Minneapolis: Bethany House, 2003. ISBN 978-0-7642-2821-6↩
Staff (April 24, 1951). &quot;Ron Hubbard Insane, Says His Wife&quot;. San Francisco Chronicle↩
Streissguth, p. 71↩
Miller, p. 170↩
Miller, p. 200↩
Atack, p. 129↩
&quot;L. Ron Hubbard: A Chronicle, 1950-1959. Church of Scientology International, 2007, retrieved February 8, 2011.↩
Miller, p. 203↩
DeChant, Dell; Danny L. Jorgensen. &quot;The Church of Scientology: A Very New American Religion&quot; in Neusner, Jacob. ''World religions in America: an introduction&quot;, p. 226. Westminster John Knox Press, 2003. ISBN 0-664-22475-X↩
Bromley, p. 91↩
Miller, p. 204↩
Miller, p. 206↩
Tucker, p. 304↩
Miller, p. 210↩
O'Brien, p. 49↩
Miller, p. 208↩
Miller, p. 212↩
Smith, Graham (August 7, 2009). &quot;Scientology founder L Ron Hubbard exposed as a 'fraud' by British diplomats 30 years ago&quot;. Daily Mail, retrieved February 8, 2011.↩
Streeter, p. 215; Miller, p. 213↩
Kent, Stephen A. &quot;The Creation of 'Religious' Scientology&quot;. Religious Studies and Theology 18:2, pp. 97&lt;U+2013&gt;126. 1999. ISSN 1747-5414↩
Methvin, Eugene H. (May 1990). &quot;Scientology: Anatomy of a Frightening Cult&quot;. Reader's Digest. pp. 16.↩
Lawrence, Sara. (April 18, 2006) &quot;The Secrets of Scientology&quot; The Independent. Retrieved February 17, 2011.↩
Staff. (April 5, 1976). &quot;Religion: A Sci-Fi Faith&quot;. Time. Retrieved February 17, 2011.↩
Did L. Ron Hubbard state that the way to make money was to start a religion? Church of Scientology International, 2003, retrieved February 8, 2011.↩
Miller, p. 214↩
O'Brien, p. vii↩
Williams, Ian. The Alms Trade: Charities, Past, Present and Future, p. 127. New York: Cosimo, 2007. ISBN 978-1-60206-753-0↩
Voltz, Tom. Scientology und (k)ein Ende, p. 75. Solothurn: Walter, 1995. ISBN 9783530899801↩
Atack, p. 137↩
Miller, p. 239↩
Atack, p. 138↩
Atack, p. 139↩
Streissguth, p. 74↩
Atack, p. 142↩
Miller, p. 227↩
Miller, p. 221↩
Miller, p. 230↩
Hubbard, L. Ron. &quot;Constitutional Destruction&quot;. June 9, 1969, retrieved February 8, 2011.↩
Miller, p. 239↩
Atack, p. 150↩
Hubbard, L. Ron. &quot;Sec Check Whole Track&quot;, HCO Bulletin of June 19, 1961; quoted in Atack, p. 152↩
Hubbard, L. Ron. &quot;Department of Government Affairs&quot;, HCO Policy Letter of August 15, 1960; quoted in Miller, p. 241↩
Miller, p. 181↩
Fooner, Michael. Interpol: issues in world crime and international criminal justice, p. 13. New York: Plenum Press, 1989. ISBN 978-0-306-43135-7↩
Miller, p. 228↩
Atack, p. 154↩
Wallis, p. 192↩
Wallis, p. 215↩
Miller, p. 250↩
Miller, pp. 252&lt;U+2013&gt;53↩
Wallis, p. 193↩
Wallis, p. 196↩
Atack, p. 183↩
Atack, p. 155↩
Atack, p. 156↩
Hubbard, L. Ron. &quot;Penalties for Lower Conditions&quot;. HCO Policy Letter of October 18, 1967, Issue IV. Quoted in Atack, pp. 175&lt;U+2013&gt;176↩
Wallis, pp. 144&lt;U+2013&gt;145↩
Atack, p. 161↩
Atack, p. 165↩
Atack, p. 189↩
Atack, p. 160↩
Miller, p. 264↩
Miller, p. 265↩
Miller, p. 269↩
Miller, p. 272↩
Miller, p. 299↩
Miller, p. 300↩
Miller, p. 290↩
Miller, p. 310↩
Miller, p. 295↩
Miller, p. 296↩
Miller, p. 311↩
Miller, p. 312↩
Atack, p. 159↩
Hubbard, L. Ron. &quot;Ron's Journal '67&quot;, quoted in Atack, p. 173.↩
Atack, p. 32↩
Atack, p. 173↩
Atack, p. 177↩
Miller, p. 285↩
Miller, p. 286↩
Atack, p. 180↩
Atack, p. 186↩
Miller, p. 301↩
Sappell, Joel; Welkos, Robert (June 24, 1990). &quot;The Mind Behind the Religion : Life With L. Ron Hubbard&quot;. Los Angeles Times, retrieved February 20, 2011.↩
Miller, p. 236↩
Miller, p. 325↩
Corydon, Bent. L. Ron Hubbard: Messiah or Madman?, p. 94. Fort Lee, N.J.: Barricade Books, 1992. ISBN 978-0-942637-57-1↩
Miller, p. 314↩
Miller, p. 318↩
&quot;L. Ron Hubbard: A Chronicle: 1970-1979&quot;. Church of Scientology International, 2007, retrieved February 8, 2011.↩
Miller, p. 316↩
Atack, p. 255↩
Atack, p. 256↩
Atack, p. 206↩
Atack, p. 204↩
Atack, p. 204↩
Atack, p. 209↩
Miller, p. 334↩
Miller, p. 336↩
Miller, p. 338↩
Miller, p. 340↩
Miller, p. 343↩
Miller, p. 344↩
↩
Beresford, David (February 7, 1980). &quot;Snow White's dirty tricks&quot;. London: The Guardian↩
Miller, pp. 317&lt;U+2013&gt;318↩
Marshall, John (January 24, 1980). &quot;The Scientology Papers: Hubbard still gave orders, records show&quot;. Toronto: Globe and Mail↩
Streissguth, p. 75↩
Reitman, p. 323↩
Marshall, John (January 26, 1980). &quot;The Scientology Papers: The hidden Hubbard&quot;. Toronto: Globe and Mail↩
Atack, p. 258↩
Atack, p. 259↩
Miller, p. 364↩
Sappell, Joel; Welkos, Robert W. (June 24, 1990). The Mind Behind the Religion : Chapter Four : The Final Days : Deep in hiding, Hubbard kept tight grip on the church.&quot; Los Angeles Times, retrieved February 8, 2011.↩
Queen, Edward L.; Prothero, Stephen R.; Shattuck, Gardiner H. Encyclopedia of American religious history, Volume 1, p. 493. New York: Infobase Publishing, 2009. ISBN 978-0-8160-6660-5↩
Walker, Jeff. The Ayn Rand cult, p. 275. Chicago: Open Court, 1999. ISBN 978-0-8126-9390-4↩
↩
↩
Miller, p. 366↩
Brown, Mark (January 30, 1986). &quot;Creston provided quiet retreat for controversial church leader&quot;. The County Telegram-Tribune, San Luis Obispo, pp. 1A/5A.↩
Behar, Richard (October 27, 1986). &quot;The prophet and profits of Scientology&quot;. Forbes 400 (Forbes)↩
Miller, p. 375↩
Petrowsky, Marc. Sects, cults, and spiritual communities: a sociological analysis, p. 144. Westport, Conn.: Praeger, 1998. ISBN 978-0-275-95860-2↩
Atack, p. 354↩
[Staff] (February 7, 1986). &quot;Hubbard Left Most of Estate to Scientology Church; Executor Appointed&quot;. The Associated Press↩
Atack, p. 356↩
Lamont, p. 154↩
Miller, p. 306↩
Lattin, Don (February 12, 2001). &quot;Scientology Founder's Family Life Far From What He Preached&quot;. San Francisco Chronicle, retrieved February 12, 2011.↩
Gallagher, Eugene V.; Ashcraft, Michael. African Diaspora Traditions and Other American Innovations, p. 172; vol 5 of Introduction to New and Alternative Religions in America. Westport, Conn.: Greenwood Publishing Group, 2006. ISBN 978-0-275-98717-6↩
↩
↩
↩
Sappell, Joel; Welkos, Robert W. (June 28, 1990). &quot;Costly Strategy Continues to Turn Out Bestsellers&quot;. Los Angeles Times, retrieved February 15, 2011.↩
Bainbridge, William Sims. &quot;Science and Religion: The Case of Scientology&quot;, in Bromley, David G.; Hammond, Phillip E. (eds). The Future of new religious movements, p. 63. Macon, GA: Mercer University Press, 1987. ISBN 978-0-86554-238-9↩
↩
Associated Press. &quot;Defections, court fights test Scientology&quot;. MSNBC.com, November 1, 2009, retrieved February 14, 2011↩
Reitman, p. 324↩
Rothstein, p. 24↩
Rothstein, p. 20↩
Gallagher, Eugene V. The new religious movements experience in America, p. 216. Greenwood Publishing Group, 2004. ISBN 978-0-313-32807-7↩
Flag Information Letter 67, &quot;L.R.H. Biography&quot;. Sea Organization, October 31, 1977.↩
Miller, p. 350↩
Frenschkowski, Marco. &quot;L. Ron Hubbard and Scientology: An annotated bibliographical survey of primary and selected secondary literature&quot;, Marburg Journal of Religion, 4:1, July 1999, retrieved February 8, 2011.↩
Available at www.lronhubbard.org↩
Cowan, Douglas E.; Bromley, David G. Cults and new religions: a brief history, p. 30. Oxford: Blackwell, 2008. ISBN 20089781405161282↩
Atack, p. 46↩
Shelor, George-Wayne. &quot;Writer tells of Hubbard's 'faked past'&quot;. Clearwater Sun, May 10, 1984↩
Murtagh, Peter (October 10, 1987). &quot;Scientologists fail to suppress book about church's founder.&quot; The Guardian.↩
